(Cite as: 3 T.B.Mon. 449,  19 Ky. 449 (Ky.),  1826 WL 1337 (Ky.)) C Court of Appeals of Kentucky. White's Heirs v. Prentiss' Heirs &c. May 26, 1826. *1 Trusts and Trustees. Creditors. Purchasers. Lotteries. Notice. Fraud. Assignees of Equities. Costs. APPEAL FROM THE FAYETTE CIRCUIT; JESSE BLEDSOE, JUDGE. West Headnotes Assignments 38 k 100 38 Assignments 38V Rights and Liabilities 38k99 Equities and Defenses Between Original Parties 38k100 k. In General. Most Cited Cases A grantor conveyed a tract of land, that he was purchasing under a contract of sale, to trustees in trust for the payment of certain creditors, and afterwards, with the connivance of the trustees, he entered into a lottery scheme, and caused the holder of the legal title to the land to convey it to a successful ticket holder, after which the trustees sold the land at auction on behalf of said creditors whose claims were not satisfied.  Held that, as the trustees had lost their equity by connivance in the lottery, the purchaser at auction acquired no title, on the principle that an assignee of an equity takes it subject to any equity against it. Debtor and Creditor 117T k 5 117T Debtor and Creditor 117Tk1 Assignments for Benefit of Creditors 117Tk5 k. Administration of Assigned Estate. Most Cited Cases (Formerly 39k261  Assignments for Benefit of Creditors) A. conveyed his estate to trustees, for the payment of certain of his creditors, and afterwards made a lottery, setting up the estate as the prize. The trustees knew of the lottery, but did not prevent it;  and two of them induced a creditor to suppress a publication of his claim, and forbidding of the lottery. B. bought one of the tickets, and drew the estate.  Held, that the trustees were responsible to the creditors for the loss. OPINION OF THE COURT, BY JUDGE MILLS. Statement. David Williamson, who was a merchant of extensive dealings, and possessed of a large estate, in the year 1814 stopped payment-- And made an asignment or conveyance of his estate, to John W. Hunt, James Haggin, William W. Worsley, and Thomas January, in trust, to secure certain debts therein named, and certain endorsers, and sureties therein specified. It does not certainly appear that the deed included all he possessed, as it has no clause passing the residuum, but from its minutely descending to articles inconsiderable and of little value, the presumption is, that his whole estate was included; nor is there any expression showing that the deed was for the benefit of general creditors, but only for those named, whose debts were to be paid according to certain preferences of grade pointed out in the deed, and the balance remaining was to be restored to Williamson. These trustees were to expose the estate to sale for the purpose of paying these debts, on the written requisition of the creditors. Among other things conveyed was a farm near Lexington, now the subject of contest, containing about one hundred and sixty acres of land which Williamson had purchased of Lewis Saunders, and had not at the date of the deed, obtained a conveyance, but had paid part of the purchase money. *2 Williamson conveys the land in contest, purchased of Saunders, with the balance of his estate in trust for his creditors. Williamson afterwards, while the trustees held the deed and before they had sold any part of the estate, published a scheme of a private lottery, in which he set up the same estate conveyed by said deed of trust, as prizes, at a value fixed thereon by himself, and industriously sold tickets in the scheme, at the price of one hundred dollars each, some of which were paid for, and as to others, it is denied in this controversy, that they were ever paid for. A lottery is made by Williamson setting up, among other property, the land in contest as one prize. Philip White, formerly the defendant in this suit in the court below, and the ancestor of the present appellants, against whom it has been revived on his death pending this suit, bought and paid for one of those tickets, and drew in the lottery as his prize the aforesaid farm of one hundred and sixty acres-- White draws the land as his prize. And to get the title to the land, Williamson arranged the matter with Saunders and settled what was due him, and he, on the direction of Williamson, conveyed the legal estate to White, who took possession thereof and has held it ever since. Saunders, in whom the legal title had remained conveys to White. This lottery was publicly made, and drawn in the town of Lexington, where these trustees and most of the creditors resided. Public notice of the lottery. After these events, the trustees received the written requisitions of the creditors to sell the estate, which was done at auction by the trustees, and Thomas G. Prentiss purchased the farm in question, at the price of $3,050, on the 8th day of January, 1818. Creditors require, trustees sell, and Prentiss purchases the land in contest. And the trustees thereupon executed to him a writing, setting out their sale and his purchase, and stating that "most of the property sold was claimed by others," and stipulating that they "were in no event to be responsible upon the sale," and they "transferred to Prentiss all the title to, and all claim upon the property, which they possessed and could convey," and engaged "to execute any other writing deemed expedient to effectuate the true intent and meaning of this sale to the said Prentiss or his assignee, he giving reasonable notice thereof. And for any defect of title the said Prentiss had recourse alone to the creditors, Williamson and his vendors." Conveyance of the trustees to Prentiss. Prentiss then filed this bill, making the trustees and White defendants, stating these facts and praying that his purchase might be completed, that White may be compelled to surrender the legal title and possession of this farm and account for the rents and profits. Prentiss' bill against White. The trustees answer and admit the deed, sale, and right of Prentiss, and unite in the prayer against White. *3 Answer of the trustees. White answered admitting that he acquired the title and possession of the lot as stated, and denies any notice which is charged against him, of there being any deed of trust upon the lot at the time he purchased and paid for his ticket, and of his reception of the title from Saunders. White's answer, denying notice, and alleging that Williamson had paid Saunders the purchase money out of the proceeds of the lottery, and insisting on his legal title and possession-- He alleges that Williamson paid the balance of the purchase-money to Saunders out of the money received for tickets, and then Saunders agreed to convey the title. He also insists that his title and possession ought not to be disturbed, however illegal the lottery may have been on the part of Williamson, that its illegality could not operate upon him and that he is entitled to hold the lot as a purchaser bona fide. He also alleges that the trustees encouraged the lottery for the very property which they claimed by their deed, and bought tickets, and were present in the same town, and never intimated anything of their deed, nor forbade the disposition of the property by lot, and that they silenced some of the creditors, whose rights were secured by the deed and who were about to prevent the lottery by a publication, and suppressed the publication, and that it is now unjust to permit the trustees to foster the scheme till the public were swindled out of their money for tickets and then to seize and sell the property to raise additional sums. He further calls upon the trustees to account for their trust and to show whether the debts were paid, and whether there is a deficit to subject this farm. Alleging also the trustees had encouraged the lottery, had notice and participated in the lottery, and suppressed a public notice, and opposition by the creditors-- He also contends that the deed is fraudulent and void as to the creditors of Williamson, who were not named therein, and even as to those who are named, because they had not assented to the deed, but many of them pursued the recovery of their debts against the deed; and he insists that as the deed contravenes the rights of others, the purchaser, Prentiss, who is named as a creditor or endorser secured by the deed, ought not to be permitted thereby to take from him the advantage at law. He also adds sundry interrogations for the trustees and Prentiss to answer, to which they respond. But we deem it not necessary for the present to notice them. Insisting also the deed was fraudulent and void as to the creditors, &c., &c. The court below decreed that the heirs of White should convey and surrender possession of the lot, and pay the rents during occupancy. From this decree they have appealed. Decree of the circuit court against White for a surrender of the title and possession and for rents. We do not deem it necessary for the purpose of deciding this cause to determine whether this deed of trust is, or is not fraudulent as to creditors; or whether White is such a purchaser for a valuable consideration as ought to be protected against it, or is in a situation to make the question. For if it be conceded that the deed was in its creation valid, and that the statute to prevent such private lotteries, operated in the same manner against the purchasers that they do against the vendors of tickets, a point which can not be maintained (we mean the statutes in force prior to 1816, which alone operate on this transaction,) still we apprehend that the result in this cause is the same. *4 Questions as to the validity of the deed of trust, and whether White is entitled to raise it, waived. It is denied by the trustees that they purchased tickets or took any direct part in the lottery. But they admit that they knew of it, and that it included the property conveyed by the deed, and were in town when the lottery was drawn and did not think proper to interfere and prevent it, though they deny being present at the drawing. Trustees admit notice of the lottery but deny participation. Two of them admit that on the day when the drawing commenced, they were present at an altercation between Williamson and Trotter, one of the creditors named in and secured by the deed. That Trotter had prepared a publication to apprize the public of his claims against the property, and insisted upon setting it up, which Williamson resisted till harsh words ensued, and that they, the two trustees, interfered, merely as mutual friends to conciliate the contending parties and keep them at peace, and induced Trotter to decline his attempt. Two of the trustees admit they induced a creditor to suppress a handbill, publishing his claim under the deed and forbidding the drawing. The proof however goes further than these admissions, and is clear that Trotter, one of the creditors, had drawn up a hand-bill forbidding the lottery, and determined to publish it on the day of drawing, and that two of the trustees, and especially one who appears to be the real owner of this farm, and the acting one on all occasions, the others barely approving without acting, applied more than once to Trotter to desist and withdraw the hand-bill, alleging that Williamson would be ruined, if the lottery did not go on, and would not be able to pay his debts. And further they assured Trotter, his debt would be paid, and offered to give their own notes with any endorsers to secure the amount of Trotter's debt, provided he would suffer the drawing to progress. Trotter accordingly said nothing. Proofs as to the suppression of the public notice and encouragement of the lottery by two of the trustees. If it be true, as is insisted by the complainants, that the lottery was an illegal or immoral transaction, with what grace can the trustees, or the assignees of an equity under them, come into a court of equity, and after they had the property secured to them to be safely kept for the payment of debts, and had in the mean time stood by and connived at the illegal imposition on the public, till numbers were fleeced of their money, and had taken such measures, to remove obstacles out of the road of that imposition till it was completed, and demand the estate back again, which was thus disposed of on the cast of the die. Even if the acquisition thereof by White, by an arrangement with Williamson was impure, they onght not to be permitted to vacate that arrangement which they fostered at the time with their eyes open, and in which they became participes criminis. For in such case, melior est conditio possidentis. *5 Trustees, or their assignee of the equity in an estate conveyed them for creditors, after promoting an illegal lottery by the debtor for a distribution of the estate can not demand of one who draws a prize and obtains the legal title and possession, to surrender it. For-- Between participes criminis, melior est conditio possidentis. If White had the attitude of a purchaser without notice, and also that of a complainant, he would, according to the decisions of this court in the case of Morrison v. Bobb's Heirs and Springle, and the case of Storrs and Brooks v. Barker, 6 John. Chy. Rep. 166, be entitled to a conveyance. And as he has here got the legal estate, and was one of the ticket holders drawn into the lottery by Williamson, with the acquiescence, and connivance of the trustees, he must be permitted to retain the estate till a claimant comes with more equity, and not till then can he be made to surrender. One having obtained the legal title to a prize drawn in an illegal lottery can not be required to surrender to those by whose approbation and concurrence he was drawn into it, nor to their assignee. It may be said that the trustees have in this case no interest, but only hold for creditors. To this it may be replied that they are the agents of the creditors and the latter are bound by their acts, and if the creditors have lost this fund by the improper acts of the trustees, the trustees are responsible to them for the loss. It may be said that Prentiss in this case is first a creditor and also a purchaser from the trustees, and as such he can not be affected by their acts. We answer that Prentiss by his purchase could only acquire an equity under the trustees, and claims through and under them, and he can not possess a better title than they held, which was an equity only; and if that equity was previously vitiated or destroyed by the improper acts of the trustees, he must abide by it, and if he was ignorant of it, at the time of his purchase, he, or rather his representatives can have their appropriate redress. Indeed in this case it does not appear that he has yet paid to the creditors the amount of his purchase; but if he has, and he was innocent of the imposition on the public, he is not remediless. In such case the acts of the debtor's trustees affects the estate, and renders them responsible for the loss to the creditors. Assignee of the trustees in such case tho' a creditor receives the claim affected as in the hands of the trustees. Nor do we conceive that the interest of the creditors can be prejudiced by this decision. If they claim against the deed, and the title of White was in fraud of their rights, it will be as accessible to them now as before. If they claim under the deed, and have done nothing to forfeit their claim they may have their redress for the injury occasioned by the improper acts of their own trustees. In every shape therefore in which we view the bearings of the case we conceive that the decree of the court which took the estate from White's heirs is erroneous. *6 Responsibility of the trustees to cestui que trusts, and the rights of creditors. It must, therefore, be reversed with costs and the cause be remanded, with directions to that court to dismiss the bill with costs as to White's heirs, against Prentiss' heirs and the defendant Haggin, and without costs as to the other defendants below. Costs. PETITION FOR A RE-HEARING, BY H. CLAY AND JAS. HAGGIN, ESQ. The progress of this cause has been rather singular, and unfortunate if exactly fair. When the brief of the appellants was read, it was supposed to contain epithets and imputations indecorous and unmerited. Under that impression, and an assurance of the counsel of the appellants, that he would revise and expunge whatever might be found exceptionable, the attorney of the defendants handed it to him, expecting, when corrected, to be again favored with its perusal, but he heard no more of the brief or cause until the evening preceding the delivery of the opinion. He, therefore, presented nothing of his views to the court, although the cause was of great concern to him. The brief of the appellants was fraught with high sounding denunciations, and the most earnest appeal to the commiseration of the court, reiterated for about twelve sheets--such as could not have been justly answered without an outrage upon good order and decorum; therefore, it was returned, and resumed for correction; and not from an apprehension that the suspicion or fraud against the trustees or either of them, as relates to this transaction, could be created, nor that sympathies could be roused in favor of an appellant, who, for the paltry consideration of one hundred dollars, advanced upon unlawful transaction, would hold an estate worth four or five thousand, to the ruin of creditors and trustees. But the suit was of some novelty in our country, if not in the annals of jurisprudence, and it had commanded much of the consideration of one of the appellees, and he did desire to be heard upon the principles involved. It must not be supposed that any undue excitement is charged. It is certain that the rights of creditors have not been forgotten. They are even advised that the trustees, or one of them, who engaged in their service under many inconveniences and great hesitation and without motive except to oblige, must account for the uttermost farthing. The principles and motives conducing to this result it is most respectfully believed, are at variance with authority and precedent, and the tenor of the opinion imposes upon the counsel a higher obligation than that of a pecuniary character.--He therefore seeks a reconsideration. Mad. Chy. p. 114, Sand. on Trusts, 196. He is entirely sensible how inexpedient it is to importune this court by tedious argument, and shall certainly endeavor to abbreviate. Indeed he does not suppose many questions involved, but there are so many matters recited with apparent emphasis as though they influenced, which therefore, may require remark, that he fears to read his petition will prove an unpleasant task. *7 It is true, that many debts are recited in the deed of trust, and a description of property, from which it might be inferred that but little estate of the debtor remained; yet debtors may have been omitted. This can be no objection to the deed. At any time before judgment, a debtor may by mortgage or deed of trust, secure any creditor. He may do this to several in succession. And surely it may be done as well by one, as several instruments. By this, every piece of property is specified, every creditor and his demand is defined; creditors and purchasers can all see, and appreciate the lien, and their own prospects, and assert their rights against the surplus, as amply as if there had been divers deeds. It is equally true that the interest of Williamson, after payment of the debts, is expressly avowed. But this is no more than would otherwise be implied under the doctrine of resulting trusts now familiar in our courts, and the expression of that which is implied, certainly can not prejudice. If it operates any thing, it enures favorably to the neglected creditors. Nor is it an exception to this deed, that Williamson had but an equity in the property, the price of which, was but partially paid before execution of the deed of trust. It is the universal practice, sanctioned invariably, to mortgage, or assign by deed of trust equitable as well as legal titles in real and personal estate, and Mr. Williamson, by the nature of his covenant, was bound to perfect the titles. And less important would seem the suggestion, if proved, that payment to Sanders was effected by the lottery funds--therefore the contrary was not attempted. The deed of trust has not been declared bad.--It assuredly was not in its origin.--It is prior in point of time, and founded upon the highest consideration known in the law; the object being to secure bona fide creditors. Then it must prevail, unless impaired by subsequent events. White can not controvert the deed of trust, nor rights acquired under it for the following reasons: 1st. He had notice of it in presumption of law ??nd in fact. 2d. Because he claims under a lottery forbidden by the letter and policy of the law, and 3d. Because his purchase is not founded upon a valuable consideration. As to notice. The deed of trust was regularly recorded and conferred notice to all. It may be said, that the recording a deed designed to convey land, where a defect shall be found in any link of the chain of title, avails nothing, because such a deed does not secure the conveyance of the land and is not, therefore, embraced by the statutes. But equitable titles in land or personalty may be assigned in trust or in mortgage, to secure debts, and such instruments are required to be recorded by the Sta. of 1748. For it uses the words "all deeds of trusts and mortgages whatsover." And the publicity of the circumstances out of which this deed sprung, and those immediately flowing from it, as alleged and proved, justify the presumption of notice in fact. *8 Touching the illegality of the transaction. The legislature of Virginia, at a very early day, denounced all lotteries as of immoral and injurious tendency.-- Sometimes that department adopts one and sometimes another mode, for the suppression of malpractices, at its discretion. And although the courts may view with a benign eye, the man who has (in the language of the court) been fleeced of his money and sues to regain it still, when they shall be required to act upon the lottery man, who has imprudently squandered that estate which is indispensable to the comfort of his family, and the rights of just creditors, surely there is equal cause to say, I find no merit here. Which party did the legislature mean to protect? I answer both; its purpose was to put down lotteries, and save all from their pernicious consequences. Just as it designed, by acting upon the winner, to suppress gaming at cards; the suppression of vice the object--the infliction of punishment its means. Prior to any statute on the subject, the court of law had averted its face from the gamester, and chancery interposed; and subsequently they have gone further, and relieved otherwise than within the provision of the statutes. The equity now is, was the transaction against the spirit and policy of the law? and the practice is to decree accordingly. See 2nd. Vernon, pages 70, 291. Newland on Contracts, 469 and 495 inclusive. Touching the objection, that White was not a purchaser for a valuable consideration, and therefore can not prevail against creditors with a prior lien, neither argument nor authority can be necessary to maintain this position, I am very certain, as a general rule. He who would impugn a fraudulent deed, must shew himself to be a creditor or purchaser for valuable or adequate consideration, and it is not very certain that such a creditor or purchaser, with notice, may not successively arrange any voluntary conveyance, and the main who claims by winning or drawing in a scheme forbidden by the law, is in this respect upon an equality with a donee; at least the gamester has no preference. Sugden 431. Cro. Eliz. 444. Cowper, 705. It is however objected to us, and this seems to be the chief reliance for the opinion, that the creditors and trustees knew of the lottery, and did not suppress it, and that one or two of the trustees fostered it, became particeps criminis, and thus have violated the deed, and all sales which they may make, & c. Here is a combination of rules and principles utterly incongruous, and deductions of fact hardly maintainable from the premises proved, Perhaps it does not appear that either of the trustees has any interest in the property in controversy, for the answer of one defendant is not testimony against another; and on this subject there is no other proof. But to the principles. Where one stands by and sees his estate sold to another for a valuable consideration, without making known his claim, he is compelled in equity to yield his title. And there is such a maxim as that recited in the opinion relative to particeps criminis. But none can well be an innocent purchaser for valuable consideration and a particeps criminis in the same transaction. *9 The progress of the first of those principles in this court is rather singular. In the case of King and Hawkins, it appeared that Wyatt and Hawkins being brothers-in-law, settled and improved adjoining farms in the county of Jessamine; that Hawkins determined to move to Green river, and desired Wyatt to go with him. That Wyatt received a proposal from King for the purchase of his farm, and communicated it to Hawkins, who advised him to take it, and he accordingly closed a contract, gave possession to King, and moved with Hawkins to Green river; and King remained in possession, believing his title perfect, and improved accordingly, for upwards of fifteen years, when Hawkins died, and his heirs sued for the land. This court first decided they had no power to relieve, because of the statute of frauds and perjuries; and upon a rehearing, they ultimately determined, that as Hawkins was not present at the contract between King and Wyatt, and did not advise King to buy, although he persuaded Wyatt to sell to him, that his case could not be brought within this principle of equity, and King was ruined. 2 Mar. 108. 3 Mar. 147. In the case of Bobb, &c. against Morrison cited by the court it decided that as Morrison was present when Jordan sold the lot to Bobb and Springle, for a valuable consideration, and did not make known his title, that he must convey. And now it is said, that as the trustees were privy to the lottery and promoted it, although they were not present at the sale of a ticket or the drawing of a prize, and although White was not a purchaser for a valuable consideration, the creditors and purchasers under the trustees are concluded. Surely this is in direct conflict with King's case, and surpasses every thing to be found in the books. The reason for the exercise of this jurisdiction, is to be found in the delinquency of the proprietor himself, and never in the default of his agent. For this purpose there never was, nor indeed can be an agency. And it is confined exclusively to a purchaser for valuable consideration: I can find no exception. As to the particeps criminis, it is a rule which comports much better with the vindictive spirit of the law, than the benevolent feelings of the chancellor; one which the judge can not admire, and has labored to qualify, (as in the case where the purchaser of the ticket sues for his money), and which the chancellor never sustains but with regret, and has almost exploded, where the object is to correct the error, and restore the parties to their original rights. Thus the gamester has received back his money, and obtained other relief where the statute was silent. Marriage brokerage bonds have been cancelled, and bonds for the sales of offices decreed to be surrendered, and the effects of other outrages upon the law and its policy, avoided, although within the provisions of no statute. But in what did the creditors or trustees participate? Did they put up, had they share or interest in the lottery? It is hoped they will not be charged with gambling, if they barely look on, and neither play nor bet. The overt act would seem to consist in dissuading Trotter from the publication of a handbill protesting against the lottery. It is unnecessary to recapitulate the admissions or proof in this respect. Their effect is no more. The law authorizes the seizure of the stakes in the race field; yet who would not advise his friend to decline an attempt of that kind. And shall he therefore be pronounced particeps criminis? *10 I have ever experienced a great repugnance to handbills and libels of every kind. They are generally the indication of bad feelings, and apt to produce their kind, and I am yet to learn if they are prescribed as a proper remedy in any case. Had Trotter posted this bill at the door of the courthouse, Williamson would have resented it as a malicious attack, a riot would have ensued, but I presume the lottery would have progressed. Certainly it is but fair to say, that the motive for the interference between Williamson and Trotter, was the conciliation of friends, and that it did not constitute those giving the advice, participators in the lottery. And although the purchaser for a valuable consideration may complain that he has sustained injury by a failure of those who hold the true title to apprise him of it, when they knew him to be engaged in a contract for the purchase of the property, yet it never lies in favor of one whose claim is founded upon an unlawful transaction. He was forbidden by the law, and additional prohibitions can not be required. At most he is only injured to the amount of his advance, and can only expect its reimbursement. It is said that Prentiss can derive no title under the trustees, because they encouraged the lottery, and thus vitiated the source of his equity. The chancellor has long asserted a control over defaulting trustees; where they have never undertaken the duty, he appoints others; where they have assented, he compels them to proceed and close the transaction. If the trustees upon such request from the creditors as proved in this cause, had refused to sell, the court upon a bill filed, would have coerced it. Say then that the trustees have erred, but without suit have resolved to correct their error, and sell. They who look at the substance of things, could hardly object to this. That has been done without suit which the court would have compelled. This notion of the contaminating influence of an error, vitiating all acts of an agent, although rightly done, until absolution shall be obtained through the medium of a chancellor, may sound well in theory, and has some authority in spiritual matters; yet for practical life, and in this nether world, is too highly refined, and remains without the sanction of a temporal court. Sugden, p. 487, says, that where one enfeoff another by covin, or without valuable consideration, and the feoffee make a feoffment for valuable consideration, and the first feoffor enter and make a feoffment for valuable consideration, the feoffee of the first feoffee shall hold; yet the first feoffee acquired title by fraud. In the case of Storrs, referred to by the court, the man who had made a valid contract and conveyance, had obtained and at the time of the sale held the title by fraud. It can not well happen that two can hold under one grantor, without the commission of a fraud by such grantor. This indeed is a strong case against the position assumed by the court. The deed stood free from imputation; and the fraud, if any, was not in the sale to the complainant, for that was a duty. This is moreover a sale by cestui que trust, for they ordered it, and they could sell in equity. Sand. on Uses, p. 209. *11 The deed and every thing done under it were just. The fraud consisted in suffering the country to be deluded. Let those who have suffered by that fraud sue and recover to the extent of their injury. What is that? Just what they have lost by the persuasion used with Trotter. If it can be supposed that Mr. Trotter's hand bill would have suppressed the lottery and prevented the payment of the price of the ticket, then perhaps they who gave that advice should reimburse it. It is very certain that the trustees by fostering the lottery neither in law or conscience injured Mr. White to the value of the farm, nor did they confer upon him a just right to it. That remains in the creditors, or those to whom the sale was made. What would have been the extent of Williamson's liability in law, or equity, if White had not received the deed? His money with interest. If other purchasers did pay, they had a right to recover it again. The conveyance to White was no bar to their action, and of course, the payment by them, no addition to his demands. The complainants, therefore, deemed it impertinent to prove how few had paid for the tickets. The opinion says, "it does not appear that Prentiss has paid the price." This could only be required, provided it could justly influence the decree in this cause. The trustees and creditors make the sale, take the security, and confer upon him all their equity consenting that he shall have the title, a consent which they have not yet retracted. It is not suggested by White that the creditors have or can be paid and indemnified, otherwise than by this means. The sale then was indispensable, and White had no remaining hope in the land or its proceeds. It is immaterial to him, whether Prentiss had or had not paid. But between the creditors and trustees and Prentiss, it stands that he did pay, and is entitled to a deed. As relates to White nothing is alleged, that can render it of any concern whether Prentiss paid or not. And this is not a suit for a settlement of the affairs of the trust. If it had been deemed material, sufficient is avered to justify the appointment of commissioners to make the enquiry. In precise conformity to a deed duly made, upon the highest consideration known to the law, Prentiss has acquired the prior equity. None except creditors or purchasers for a valuable consideration can question it. And being a bona fide and specific lien, even against those it must prevail. It is certainly true in relation to trusts, that no fraud or default of the trustees, even where they combine can prejudice the interest of cestui que trust. Sanders on Uses, p. 193: says, "If a trustee commit felony, treason, die without heir, devise the estate, become involved, bankrupt, incumber the property, cestui que trust will hold free from all forfeiture or incumbrance. And the same author says that, there is but one means by which the trustee can affect the right of cestui que trust, and that is by conveying for a valuable consideration, and without notice; See Sugden 544; 3d Peere Williams 215. *12 1st, P. W. 128, Mad. 363. Here the participation in the fraud is only imputed to two of four trustees, who in relation to the estate could only act jointly. The subject of the lottery attempted by Williamson deserves consideration under two aspects. 1st, As it respects Williamson himself, and White; and, 2d, As it regards the trustees. Williamson's lottery was clearly forbidden by law and, therefore, illegal. It was illegal as it respects all parties. It can not be considered as legal on the part of the purchaser of a ticket, and illegal in respect to the vender of the same ticket. The law makes no such discrimination. It denounces, without reservation, the lottery, in all its parts and parties. Let us stop for a moment to enquire into the situation of White when he purchased the ticket. He intended to buy and Williamson to sell a ticket which should entitle him to the prize which, by possibility, it might subsequently draw. He did not purchase the land in controversy, but the chance or contingency of drawing it, or any other prize which fortune might assign to his ticket. Now all this was illegal, being expressly forbidden by law. He could not lawfully purchase, through the instrumentality of a lottery, the estate in controversy; because, such a lottery was forbidden by law. He could not, for the same reason, buy the chance or contingency of purchase. The most then, at the moment of the purchase of the ticket, that can be said in behalf of White is, that he expended $100, the price of the ticket, on an object interdicted by law. Doubtless he could immediately have sued for and recovered back that sum from Williamson, or whoever else he paid it to, upon the ground of a failure of the consideration, unless his participation in a forbidden object would have constituted a bar. And this $100 with its interest, it is most respectfully suggested to the court, is the utmost limit of any claim legal, equitable or moral, which White has upon any one, in consequence of the purchase of the ticket. Suppose Williamson had never created any trust, and had possessed the legal title to the estate in controversy, could White have compelled him to convey the estate, upon the ground, that he had drawn it as a prize against a ticket which he had purchased in his lottery? That he expressly assented to the lottery is undeniable; for he, Williamson, made the lottery. In his case, there would have been no necessity to infer, from his connivance, an implied assent to the lottery; and to have branded him with fraud in not complying with the conditions of the lottery. For the lottery was of his institution, and undoubtedly upon the supposition which has been made, he would have been chargeable with fraud, if fraud can be imputed to a man for declining to do that which the laws of his country discountenance and prohibit. I would repeat again, or rather put in another form the question: Suppose I make a lottery tomorrow, and endeavor by means of it to dispose of my real estate and other property, which lottery is not authorized by special act of assembly; suppose I make the most solemn and repeated assurances of my determination to convey the estate to whoever draws it; the lottery proceeds; and the holder of a fortunate ticket demands of me a conveyance of my estate; can he compel me to make it? Let me add another supposition, and that is, that the title to the real estate which I would thus alienate by lottery is in my friend, and this friend unites with me in proclaiming to the world that he will convey the estate to the holder of the successful ticket, attends the lottery and assists in drawing it; can my friend be compelled by such holder, by suit in chancery, or otherwise, to convey the estate. It is most respectfully believed that both these questions must be answered in the affirmative, before White's heirs can lawfully prevail in the present controversy. *13 Secondly. As to the trustees. Having shown that Williamson could not, in derogation of the law of the land, set up a lottery, and create a responsibility on his part to convey the estate, proposed to be gambled off by that lottery, it would seem necessarily to follow that neither could his trustees be bound to convey. Could the trustees even have united in the scheme, co-operated in the sale of the tickets, and assisted in drawing the lottery, and by all or any of these several acts placed themselves under an obligation to convey the property? It is confidently believed they could not. A prohibition of all lotteries, is a prohibition of all lotteries whether by trustees or others, or whether by express act or by implied means. The acts of the legislature spare none; they denounce all; they prohibit the end; they prohibit therefore all the means to accomplish that forbidden end, whether direct or indirect, express or implied. It is fairly to be inferred from the reasoning of the court, that, if the trustees had been ignorant of Williamson's lottery, and had given no countenance or assent to it, a different decree would have been thought to be proper. But, if I am right, no act of the trustees, however solemn, and unambiguous and express, could have given validity to that lottery, and that simply because that lottery was prohibited by law. Now if the trustees were disabled by an express act to make legal what the legislature had made illegal, certainly that effect could not be accomplished by inferences drawn from the conduct of the trustees. A lottery is a species of gambling, and is so treated and considered. Now let me suppose that I was present when a gambler should undertake to sport away a part of my real estate, I did not forbid it, I even encouraged the play; the stake is lost, am I bound to convey it? It would give to this paper, already too much drawn out, a most unreasonable length, if all the conduct of all the trustees were now to be commented and dwelt upon. A single circumstance, on which the court appears to have laid much stress, will be noticed; and that is that Trotter, one of the creditors, was induced, by two of the trustees, "and especially one who appears to be the real owner of this farm," to desist from putting forth a publication prohibiting the lottery. This circumstance, if it is entitled to any force, must derive it from the tendency which it has to show that the trustees assented to the lottery. But it has been already attempted to be shown that, if their assent to the lottery had been yielded in the most authentic, express and solemn form, it could not have rendered it valid. Now what would Mr. Trotter's prohibition have amounted to? Could it have had more effect than the existing law of the land which prohibited the lottery? Or could that law have acquired any new obligation or force, by having superadded to the authority of its interdict the prohibition of a private individual? The public is said to have been cheated by the sale of lottery tickets in Williamson's lottery. But the public must be presumed to have known its own law. *14 Or let another supposition be made, that all parties supposed it well enough that the lottery should proceed, that the tickets should be sold, and the proceeds applied to the payment of Williamson's debts. It is highly probable that this purpose was generally believed to be legal and innocent, and further, it is most probable that it would have been effectuated if there had been a punctual payment of the price of all the tickets. But in the progress of the business, the lottery is discovered to be illegal, purchasers of tickets refuse to pay for them, the scheme is totally defeated. Is it right that Mr. White, who is only out of pocket $100, should recover the entire farm in dispute? Will not most full justice be done him by a return of the $100 with interest? If the public generally has been defrauded ought he alone to profit by it? The price of the property, of which disposition was attempted by the lottery, is the amount of all the tickets which were sold, subject to customary charges. And it never can be pretended that the land has been paid for unless it be shown that the tickets have been all paid for. Is it right to hold Williamson or his trustees bound to pay the prizes of the lottery, whilst the purchasers of the tickets are held exonerated from the payment of the price of the tickets? Is one party bound and the other free? With great deference to the court, it is believed that the decree assumes that the price of the land in controversy was the $100 paid by White, whereas the price, in fact, was the aggregate amount of all the tickets, at least that constituted the estimated value of all the property which was lotteried off. Let Mr. White show that the tickets have been all paid for, with only the usual losses from insolvency, and then he may come forward in the name of the public, and claim that since that has been defrauded, he ought to recover the controverted land. The case before the court is one of a joint trust. Ought the separate acts of some of the trustees to affect the estate, and divert it altogether from the objects of the trust? In all the cases where a bystander mortgagee loses his prior lien, or a bystander loses his property, the forfeiture is the result of a culpable silence to the detriment of an innocent and bona fide purchaser engaged in a lawful transaction. Is that the case before the court? Could White be allowed to aver ignorance of the law prohibiting lotteries? Was he an innocent and bona fide purchaser of the property? Has he paid a full and valuable consideration for it? Trusts are the creatures of courts of equity, highly favored, always protected. Trustees are even forbidden to do anything contrary to the trust. Purchasers are often bound to look to the subsequent application of the purchase money paid for trust property, and to see that the trust is faithfully executed. "I do not recollect any case where the trustee alone can affect the trust estate by forfeiture or by incumbrances." See Sand. on uses page 192-3-4. *15 What is the condition of the cestui que trust? He has lost the estate and he has lost the price of the tickets, not recoverable at law. But it is said that the creditors are not without redress; that they may sue the trustees, &c. Which of the trustees? They are not liable for the conduct of each other. Would an action on the case lie? Would a bill in equity? The court is entreated to consider what would be the form of the declaration in such an action; what the allegations in such a bill. Would the dissuasive of Trotter's publication be the ground of recovery in the one mode or the other? It is confidently believed, with the greatest deference to the court, that the creditors would be found practically to be utterly remediless. There are many other considerations which, but for want of time, and in consequence of the great length o?? this petition, would be submitted to the court. There exists on the part of the counsel of the petitioners a strong desire to argue this cause, a firm but respectful conviction that, more deliberation and a fuller view of the whole subject, would bring the court to conclusions different from those which it has adopted; and in conclusion the petitioners humbly pray that the court will order a re-hearing. ANSWER OF THE APPELLANTS TO THE PETITION, BY ROBERT WICKLIFFE, ESQ. The counsel for White's heirs feels himself called upon before he notices the argumentative part of the petition of the counsel for defendants to defend himself from the charges or insinuations contained in said petition. This repliant states that it is true, that he did, at the most earnest and repeated solicitation of Charles Humphreys, Esq. with the assent of this court, agree to submit this cause upon a brief, and this he declares he did with some reluctance, and great inconvenience to himself; but Mr. Humphreys having declared that he had his brief ready which contained all he wished said, and his extreme desire to have the cause decided last fall, this respondent consented to throw aside his other pressing business; but at the same time asked Mr. Humphreys if Mr. Haggin did not wish to argue it; Mr. Humphreys said not, that Mr. Haggin had sold out to him and that he was contented to risk it. And this repliant will further state that, as well as he recollects, the cause was wholly managed in its final trial by Mr. Humphreys; and although Mr. Haggin knew of the trial, he certainly, according to his best recollection, withdrew from court, or took no part in it; this circumstance added to the connection between Mr. Haggin and Mr. Humphreys, and the respectable standing of Mr Humphreys, left no earthly doubt on his mind that the entire control of the cause was confided to Mr. Humphreys. The understanding between Mr. Humphreys and this repliant was, that each was to hand in his brief, and Mr. Humphreys, before he left town, informed him he had left his with the judges, which this repliant never saw, nor did he think himself entitled to see under the arrangement. This repliant then in much haste wrote out his statement and handed it to the judges, supposing that all remarks as to counsel were closed; but to his surprise he learned from Mr. Haggin, that the court had furnished him with the respondent's written statement for his reply, and he complained that some of the remarks were harsh and personal, on which this repliant answered that he certainly considered the cause at an end, and that he never would have consented to have surrendered his right to conclude the cause, and acceded to the proposals of Mr. Humphreys, if he had expected that his remarks were to be replied to. But if Mr. Haggin would oblige him with the statement, he would correct any expressions which were needlessly harsh or severe; that he had written in haste and at a moment of some excitement, and was only tenacious as to the argument, and would be happy to remove any unpleasant expressions, so that he preserved the sense. This happened in Lexington, where Mr. Haggin was, in February last, who promised to hand it to this repliant in a day or two, but which he never did until a considerable time in the last term, when this repliant expressed to him his wish that he would either give him his argument or return it to the judges, as he was not willing that the judges should have Mr. Humphrey's statement alone to deliberate on. Mr. Haggin handed it to this repliant shortly afterwards, without expressing a wish to again see it; nor was it supposed he wished to see it again except to be assured that the expressions excepted to were modified. For which purpose this repliant intended to again show the paper to Mr. Haggin, and for no other; but he went to Jessamine court, where he remained for some time, and this repliant handed the brief to the judges, without any alteration as he believes in its meaning, and with but little change in its verbiage or wording. On the first interview, he thinks, he had with Mr. Haggin, he informed him that he had returned the brief to the judges, and here ended everything that he recollects relating to the conduct of this repliant. He is sure he felt neither motive nor inclination to leave Mr. Haggin without a knowledge of what his brief contained, and he certainly had as good a chance, after he had had possession of the brief for six months, to reply to it. as this repliant had to respond to Mr. Humphrey's brief, which he never saw, and never wishes or expects to see. *16 In answer to so much of the petition as attempts an argument of the question, the defendant's counsel is compelled to declare that after the most mature deliberation and thorough examination of it, which he feels himself capable of, he is unable to perceive anything new or solid in the view attempted to be taken. The complainant's counsel do not attempt to show that they have equity, but they labor to prove that White has not. Indeed they beg the question from the word, and having done so proceed accordingly. First, they take it as granted that a mere chose in action is the subject of grant by mortgage without a delivery, and that a record of such deed is good. Now Williamson had but a chose in action, a parol or a bond contract on Saunders; could this be mortgaged and the bond be and remain with Saunders? Was the mortgage an assignment so that the mortgagee could sue at law in his own name? Surely not. By common law this bond could only be sued on by Williamson, and, by statute, it changes owners and the right to sue, by assignment. And is every assignee, before he takes an assignment of a bond, note or bill, to see that there is no mortgage on it. Surely not. The only case recollected on this point is the case of Edwards and wife against J. Hughes and others, in the circuit court of the United States. Hughes having an equity to a lot in Lexington, mortgaged it to Mrs. Edwards, to secure a sum of money borrowed. This mortgage included the house in which he lived and held in fee, and the lot of which he had only an equity, adjoined his residence. Hughes sold to Wilson, and Wilson procured the deed from the trustees of the town of Lexington. The mortgage was duly recorded and the only question in the case was, whether the mortgage was constructive notice to Wilson. The circuit court of the United States for this district, decided that it was not, and the decision has been affirmed in the Supreme court. I take it, therefore, that constructive notice is out of the question, and that my clients are purchasers without notice; not admitting that notice would bind them. But the ingenuity must be admired with which the gentlemen get around the questions presented in the cause by proving, by their own mode of reasoning, that White could not obtain the aid of a court of equity to enforce a conveyance. This is certainly easier done than to prove what it behove them to prove, that is, that they have a right to the aid of a court of equity. If a man sell you his land worth ten thousand dollars for one dollar, it would be very difficult for you to obtain a decree for a conveyance; but not half so difficult as it would be for him to obtain a decree for a re-conveyance, if he had conveyed in consideration of one dollar. The time of the court will not be wasted in attempting to familiarize the rule, that the defendant may hold until the complainant shows that he has a right in law and conscience to the interposition of a court of chancery. It is sufficiently laboured in the brief, and the authorities referred to are again submitted to the court. If a man promises you a gift, can not compel a specific performance, but if he give and you are possessed, it is yours in law and equity. Here Williamson was morally and in honor bound to comply with the terms of the lottery; no law forbade his doing so; under this moral sense he takes the $100 and makes the conveyance, or causes it to be done; the contract is complete and neither Mr. Haggin nor Mr. Clay has ventured to suggest an opinion that Williamson could recover the land again. No, in law, in conscience, in equity, it was forever gone, when made perfect in White by the deed, as to Williamson; and it will be shown, if not already done, that his assignee stands in no better condition. It has been before stated that the law did not make the lottery, as to the fortunate ticket holder, void, and this doctrine is expressly recognized by this court in the case of Hardin Gray against William Roberts, 2nd Marshall 209. *17 The gentlemen have likened it to the case of securities or titles obtained under gaming and usurious contracts; but here they fail. These contracts are expressly declared to be void by the statutes relating to them; and it is said by Lord Coke, that securities, such as bonds, &c. would be good and valid because they import a consideration, if the statute had not, with intent to prevent the particular mischiefs, not only prohibited the practice, but declared all bonds, &c. void. It is most obvious that the legislature did not intend to protect lottery ticket sellers, but ticket buyers. And it only prevents a suit to recover the price of a ticket, but goes no further. This deed is not made to Williamson, nor by Williamson, but by Saunders who receives when he makes it $5,000. It was not won from Saunders; but the consideration is adequate, and surely as to Saunders it is made on good consideration--It is therefore valid. Suppose the case of a gentleman who wins money, and the loser pays, and he immediately buys land with the money, or suppose the loser pays money to the grantor; as to the grantor and grantee the deed is good. So if the gamester promises to pay a gaming debt to a third person who accept it in discharge of a debt from the fortunate gambler, even this promise is good. These cases tend to show what i?? meant by void contracts under the statutes quoted, and to illustrate by them that White's deed under the lottery from Williamson might be bad, yet when he derivers under Saunders, who has been paid for it, he has it on valuable consideration. He paid Williamson $100 only, but for this Williamson assigns on Saunders his chose in action, and that chose is merged by Saunders' deed. It has been already said that Williamson might give White $5,000--it is not pleaded that sum belonged to the trustees. He does do so, and buys the title from Saunders. Is there anything dishonest in this Anything prejudicial to the trust estate? It is not pretended that the land was in point of fact, worth $5,000, and of course the mortgage or deed of trust was worth nothing, unless the complainants had shown that the land was bought with their money, which is not pretended. I will now attempt to show by a very few additional remarks, that the complainants cannot have the interposition of a court of equity. The suit is in the name of Prentiss, but admitted to be for the benefit of Mr. Haggin; Mr. Haggin is now not only the attorney at law in this contest, but urges his interest as attorney, as a reason why the court should reconsider their opinion. Indeed he presses his claim in a three fold character; 1st, Prentiss is a fair purchaser; 2nd, he is himself a fair purchaser; and lastly by permitting White to hold what he has, you take the property from the creditors. That is, to get it from White, the property is Mr. Prentiss', Mr. Haggin's, and belongs to the creditors. I will show that it belongs to neither. First, as to creditors. It is a matter well settled by our law, that mere choses in action, such as bonds or parol contracts for land, can not be subjected to the claim of creditors either in law or equity. The old cases of Saunders and Allan, and of Buford and Buford, and of Thomas and Marshall settle this point. Then as no creditors could either at law or equity reach the claim of Williamson, he might as to creditors assign away the claim upon Saunders upon a good or void consideration, or give it away; and sure it is, no creditor can now by his bill touch the property, no matter however fair his claim may be. Then can the complainant recover? That he can not I refer to the brief of the defendants. First he claims under a deed of trust, fraudulent and void. I deny the right of a man to become bankrupt and at pleasure make his own bankrupt law. The deed must not be made with intent to hinder creditors. If a man could create a trust at pleasure for all his creditors what becomes of your fi fa and ca sa laws? Who would have one atom sold when by creating this general mortmain he might prevent every atom of his property from sale? If he can not so convey his property much less can he make a general conveyance and point out his favorite creditors. I deny that such a deed as the one in contest ever was held to be valid either upon the principles of the common law or under the statutes of Elizabeth. It is true that a man may sell to a creditor, or mortgage to a creditor to pay his debt and thereby give a preference; but it does not follow that he can sell his whole property or mortgage his whole estate to one creditor, or a set of creditors, with intent to sacrifice the balance of his creditors, nor with intent to hinder or delay them. *18 Can any man read this deed of trust and wink so hard as not to see, that it is made with intent to hinder and delay creditors? In making this remark I wish to be understood as referring to the deed and the motive of its execution, inferable from its provisions. Mr. Williamson was indebted, and Mr. Williamson was in possession of property, Mr. Williamson by law was a free agent, and made capable to hold or sell his own property; but the law made Mr. Williamson liable to suit, and execution followed judgment. He knows this and so do his trustees. What then is the shift? To convey his whole estate to trustees not liable at law, and clog the trust with divers stipulations and contingencies, to render redress in chancery tardy, if not impracticable, to the great delay of creditor, and so expensive as to beat off the small ones altogether. Is this permissible? If it is, then the statute against fraudulent conveyances is a dead letter. The statute speaks of hindrance and delay &c. How long has every creditor been delayed? Nine years, and until Williamson's death, and so far as the court know, not one creditor satisfied. If deeds of this kind are tolerated, will any debtor ever pay but at his own will and pleasure? And will not every debtor become a bankrupt in his own time and in his own way? The counsel for the trustees state that the property is set forth, the debts are set forth, and all may see, &c. See what? The deed of trust, I presume; for they do not pretend to say they themselves have ever seen the property or half of it. Passing from this part of the petition. It is perceived that the counsel for the trust is laboring to prove that the conduct of the trustees, subsequent to the trust can not affect the trust. This argument is certainly more subtle than solid. A moment's reflection will prove to the contrary. A man may lose his own estate fairly acquired, by his conduct. As in the case of Anderson and Kirkham, where Anderson, who had fairly bought and paid for Garnett's land, and had moreover a decree for a title, advised his neighbor Kirkham to buy from Garnett's agent; Kirkham bought and obtained the legal title and ejected Anderson, and this court refused relief to Anderson, though his title was well known to Kirkham, and he resided on his place for years before Kirkham's purchase. The case of Morrison, executor of Nicholas, referred to is a strong case. There Morrison, an executor, by being present and witnessing the bond from Jordon, lost the title and the benefit of his contract with Seits as an executor, and as defendant was compelled to convey. But here the party is complainant; whatever, therefore, shows that in conscience and moral equity the legal title ought not to be disturbed may be fairly alleged. Hence I contend that the subsequent conduct of the trustees may be examined for the twofold purpose of showing, first, the intent with which the deed; was made; and second, to prove that by the conduct of the trustees and especially that one for whose use the decree is sought, has been such as to forfeit all claim to the interposition of a court of equity. *19 Is the fact that the trustees never possessed themselves of the property, never kept any accounts of the sales of the personal estate, that they constituted Williamson who had constituted them, and never asked or called for an account, no evidence of the intent and meaning of this deed of trust? It is not enough that the deed shall be fair on its face, it must be fair in fact, and every act of the trustees evinces the character of this transaction. They take care not to stipulate for each other, and hence it is, that Hunt, &c. seem to have no care about the estate. Can it be believed that such men would have in good earnest undertaken the liquidation and settlement of debts to the enormous amount enumerated, and thousands untold, of property scattered on the four quarters of the earth, and folded their arms and remained in listless apathy as they have done? Impossible. Now say what you will, this was, in gentle terms, a mere accommodation trust. These men, no doubt, would have scorned the idea of assisting Williamson to defraud his creditors. But they were willing to let him use their name to gain time, and I think I speak the sentiments of their hearts, when I say that they would have seen him hanged before they would have undertaken the drudgery and toil of performing the deed of trust according to its import. No; they performed their trust according to the understanding of themselves and Williamson, when they acknowledged the deed. If not why did they not have dower relinquished. They are content that he shall sell, shall squander, shall lottery off the property. It is no affair of theirs. None of the trustees pretended ignorance of the lottery. January and Haggin are active in promoting of it; it progresses, and White succeeds in drawing a part of the property, obtains the title, settles upon the land by his tenant; and then the trustees for the first time move. They sell. To whom? To Prentiss, who does not pay a cent, but who sells his bid to Mr. Haggin, a trustee; Mr. Haggin, as was before stated, pays; Mr. Haggin the seller, becomes buyer; and a bill in equity is then brought by him, in the name of Prentiss, to wrest from White the legal title. And is it not competent for White to say, not only that the deed of trust is fraudulent, but that the claim is now asserted by a person who does not entitle himself to the aid of a court of equity? The answer that only Haggin and January sanctioned the lottery, is entitled to no consideration; first, because it is not true in fact--their knowledge is charged; that it was also advertised by Worsley in his paper is also charged, and not denied. They stipulate for themselves. Haggin and January are found preventing Trotter from disclosing Williamson's situation, declaring if the lottery is stopped Williamson was ruined, offering to assure Trotter's debt; and, after all, Mr. Haggin becomes owner of the property. The question is not what Hunt did, but what has he done who complains. He has pushed the lottery, he has caused the property to be sold, has taken the bargain, and asks to have his sale consummated. REJOINDER TO THE APPELLANT'S ANSWER, BY H. CLAY AND JAS. HAGGIN, ESQS. *20 Arguments immeasurably extended must be as unprofitable as they are irksome. And one would think that the taste of no one would prompt him, in an answer to a petition for the rehearing of a suit in chancery, to pour out the treasures of declamation. It is averred, in many a shape, by the adversary counsel, that one of the trustees is interested in this controversy. Were this an important consideration, (and that counsel seems at least to attach much consequence to it,) it would be sufficient to say, that the fact does not judicially appear. What is the proof? The answer of that defendant, which is no evidence against his co-defendants or the complainant. But if by subsequent transactions, one of the trustees has acquired the equity, which the creditors held, it is believed he may lawfully and conscientiously assert it. White would now pass for a purchaser. So might every donee, technically speaking, and every gambler who had acquired by his calling, the estate of his fellow-citizen. But he is certainly not a purchaser within the intent of the statute of frauds, nor in the acceptation of the chancellor. He denounces fraud and grows infuriate against creditors in the cause of creditors. Yet he has no merit himself, and is not in a posture to protect creditors. Are any creditors injured? Let them complain; but do not let White run away with the means of their redress. Have the trustees violated their duty? They stand amenable to the law. It is said that the purchaser under the trustees has not paid.--This is with the parties to the deed. Surely the creditors know the charge untrue. Nor will the assertion derive any countenance from White's own cross bill--"The trustees are not bound for each other,"--Nor should they be. The law would not imply it, and the forms provide against it. Are even executors mutually responsible? It is contended that the record of this deed of trust, does not convey notice. If it did then nothing could protect White, not even his being purchaser for a valuable consideration. Such a purchase would be deemed male fide. But if it did not communicate notice, still it vested an equity prior in point of time, to any pretence of title acquired by White; and one confident reliance is, his failure to give any equivalent, and the violation of positive law in the mode of his acquiring the title. We acknowledge that the estate of Williamson in this land was not subject to execution; still this does not impair the equity of creditors under the mortgage; though it might silence the cry for general creditors. Will the learned counsel on the other side contest the ability of Williamson to make a valid engagement for the sale of his interest, although he could not transfer the legal title? Such a sale, as that a subsequent purchaser, at the highest price, having notice, could not hold? Or that he might mortgage or convey it in trust for the benefit of creditors? Although the law creates no lien, or such an interest, in favor of any creditor, doubtless the owner of it, by his own contract, may create it. *21 The creditors are now supposed to have notice of the lottery. More truly might this knowledge be imputed to White. But if they all knew it, what did they know? Of an illegal operation, which being forbidden by law, could be legalized neither by silence nor by express assent. But if assent could sanctify it, ought White to not have obtained or seen such written assent? It is now alleged that more of the trustees knew of and assented to it. The principle cannot be changed--the trustees are only agents to a limited extent, and with qualified powers. The authorities cannot be mistaken. Trustees can bind in only one case otherwise than in conformity to the deed; and that is the case of a bona fide purchaser for valuable consideration. The doctrine that the chancellor will not always refuse to interfere for one when, touching the same transaction, he would not relieve the other party, is inapplicable. Even if he would not cancel the conveyance at the instance of Williamson, or relieve a general creditor, it does not follow that he will withhold his interposition in behalf of a prior specific lien, to secure specified just debts. The learned counsel inveighs against the deed of trust. A man must not make his own bankrupt law. And is this a bankrupt law? Is it not an abuse of language so to denominate it? The law might, if it pleased, restrain a doubtful debtor from all alienations of his property, even for the most honest purposes. But it has not done it. It has provided when the general lien of the creditor takes effect, and that is from the delivery of the execution to the officer. Up to that time it has left the debtor free, honestly to dispose of his estate. It might interdict all preferences, but it has not done it. It makes preferences itself--in cases of Ward's estate, &c., &c., &c. Nature makes preferences. Their basis is sealed in every man's heart, and their justice sanctioned by the unsophisticated feelings of every human bosom. Deeds of this description are believed to be countenanced in every state in the union and in every civilized society. There is no general condemnation of them. Each is judged by the peculiar circumstances which attend it, and pronounced valid o?? fraudulent accordingly. The learned counsel by admitting that a debtor may prefer one creditor, concedes the point. Where is the limit? He would nevertheless, prevent all general conveyances for preferred creditors, and leave them all, en masse, to rush into the courts and to run a race for the first judgment and first execution. And is he sure that the most meritorious would always win? Is he certain that, upon his scheme of dispensing justice, even equity in the end would be administered? Even according to his plan, may not the debtor, by accelerating or retarding the recovery of judgments, secure in another way, those very preferences, which the learned counsel is so shocked at? A re-hearing was granted, and the cause again argued before Judges Owsley and Mills. But the court. on consideration, adhered to the former decision. To which effect-- JUNE 22, 1826. JUDGE MILLS delivered the second opinion of the court. *22 The bill of the complainant states that David Williamson (who is made a defendant,) purchased of Lewis Saunders a tract of about 180 acres of land, of which Saunders was seized in fee, and paid the purchase money, but did not obtain a conveyance, except for a few acres thereof; that being indebted to the late Kentucky Insurance Company, the Bank of Kentucky, George Norton and others, on the 27th of December, 1814, to secure these debts, and indemnify his creditors and endorsers--he, Williamson, executed a deed of conveyance to John W. Hunt, Thomas January, William W. Worsley, and James Haggin, (who were also made defendants,) for this farm and some other estate in trust, authorizing them to make sale of the property on such credit as might seem to them expedient, upon the default of Williamson to make payment, and the request of the creditors, as would appear by the deed, made part of the bill, and which is referred to for the description of the property, the object of the deed, the pre-requisites to a sale, and the mode of distribution, and which was recorded in the proper office and attended with much publicity; that Williamson himself had dealt very extensively and was generally known in that quarter of the country; that the defendant, Williamson, failed to satisfy the demands provided for by the deed, and the creditors, having long indulged him, at length by their written directions required the trustees to make sale of the estate, and after much procrastination, by injunction on the part of Williamson, they finally published as required by the deed, and in all things conforming to its provisions, they exposed the estate to sale, when the complainant, Thos. G. Prentiss, became the purchaser of the aforementioned tract of land, as would appear by the certificate of the trustees filed with the bill; whereby, and by the terms of the sale, h?? was entitled, as he was advised, to a conveyance, which it was the wish of the creditors and trustees should be immediately made to him. Allegations of the complainant, T. G Prentiss' bill. But a certain Philip White, (who was also made defendant,) pretending to have won the same of Williamson, in some lottery or other gaming transaction, had lately obtained the legal title from the said Saunders, and refused to cancel the same or to transfer it to the complainant, although fully notified of his purchase, and had been requested to convey or cancel--and although he well knew the lottery or other transaction, by color of which he obtained title, and by which he held it, was unauthorized in law, illegal and void, and conferred no equity, but was offensive and punishable by law--and although he knew that the pretended lottery or gaming transaction was set on foot after the execution of the deed of trust, aforesaid, and his deed was perfected with full notice of it--and that his deed was prepared with some pains to avoid the just rights of the creditors under the trust; and so conscious was he, that he could not prevail in equity, he obtained possession of the land, and by his son and servants committed great waste, and more especially since the purchase of the complainant, and had engaged a certain John Payne (who is also made defendant,) to employ a number of hands to cut down timber and make sale of it, resolving to make profit of it while he was suffered to retain it. *23 The bill concludes by praying a conveyance and possession of the land, and an account for the waste rents and profits, and an injunction restraining waste, and is signed by James Haggin, as counsel for complainant. Prayer of the bill. March 6, 1818, before a circuit judge, the following affidavit was made on the bill: "This day James Haggin made oath before the undersigned, that the defendant Payne informed him of his determination to cut down and sell the timber on the land in controversy, and that he was privy to the circumstances relative to the deed of trust and purchase by the complainant, and believes the allegations of the bill true." Affidavit on motion for injunction to stay waste. On the 8th of the same month an injunction to stay waste was awarded by the judge. An injunction bond was entered into, with John T. Mason security, and on the 26th of April, a subpoena with injunction issued. Injunction. August 10th, 1818. The defendants, Williamson?? Hunt, January, Worsley and Haggin filed their answers. Answers filed. Williamson admits the deed of trust, the sale by the trustees, the purchase of complainant, and states that, with a hope of redeeming himself from embarrassments, and paying his just debts, he did, after the execution of the deed of trust, resolve on a lottery scheme for the distribution of property, confident that the purchasers of tickets would with due promptitude, pay the amount, and thus enable him to redeem the property and convey to those who drew prizes, and he believed his purpose and condition of his property was generally known to the purchasers of tickets--that the defendant White, held a ticket, at the price of one hundred dollars, and drew as a prize the tract of land in the bill mentioned, which was bought from Lewis Saunders, but for which he, himself had not received a deed or paid all the price to Saunders--that he settled the balance of the money, and requested Saunders to convey to White, which was done--that to his great mortification he proved unsuccessful in collecting. Payment was refused in many instances, because of the illegality of the measure, and consequently the creditors required, and the trustees made sale of the land. Substance of Williamson's answer. This answer was sworn to in the usual form. The answer of Hunt, January, Worsley and Haggin admits the deed of trust to them, the failure of Williamson to satisfy the demands provided for by the deed, the order of the creditors to sell, the injunction of Williamson, the sale and purchase of Prentiss, and that they were satisfied the title should be made to him; for they were informed and believed that subsequent to the deed of trust, which was a matter of much publicity, the defendant White had obtained a deed for the same land from Lewis Saunders. This answer is neither signed nor sworn to, nor is any objection made to it by the complainant. Answer of the trustees. The answer of Payne, who appears to be only the tenant of White denies the commission of waste in the manner charged in the bill, and waives going into the controversy as to title, and his answer appears to be, as to this controversy, unimportant. *24 Answer of Payne, White's tenant. August 8, 1818, the defendant White answered, and requires proof of the deed of trust, admits a scheme for a lottery by Williamson to distribute his estate, that he, White, purchased a ticket therein at the price of one hundred dollars actually paid, and drew the tract of land in contest, and about two months afterwards received a conveyance from Saunders by direction of Williamson, and also possession of the land, which he took, not from the motives charged to him by the complainant, but believing it to be his own, and denies that he wasted or used the land improperly. He requires proof that the trustees executed a sale to Prentiss. White's original answer. He contends that the deed of trust is fraudulent and void as to creditors and purchasers, because it was calculated to delay, hinder and defraud them--And he denies any notice thereof, until long after he had paid for his ticket and reeived a conveyance for, and possession of the land. And charges that about $5,000 of the purchase money was raised by Williamson of the proceeds arising from the sales of tickets in the lottery, and paid to Saunders before he conveyed the estate. Objection by White to complainants equity. He insists that the trustees and most of the creditors encouraged, aided and consented to the lottery, purchased tickets, and advised others to purchase; and although the trustees resided in Lexington, where Williamson resided, and the lottery was drawn, and although Haggin, one of the trustees, was a lawyer, learned in the law and statutes, yet the trustees and creditors, many of them were present at the drawing, and never intimated an objection to the same, but held out to the people that the scheme was lawful and right, and appealed to the liberality of the public to support it; and that Worsley, one of the trustees, was the editor of a newspaper, and published therein the scheme, assuring the public that titles would be made to the drawers of prizes; that after the drawing of the lottery, January offered to purchase the land of him, and Haggin actually made a conditional contract for it, without suggesting a doubt of the title; and that Haggin had offered to relinquish the purchase for one half the land; that these trustees and creditors smiled on the lottery until they enabled Williamson to collect from the unsuspecting purchasers of tickets, from twenty to fifty thousand dollars, and afterwards combining with the complainants and others, purchasers of tickets, proceeded, as he as told to sell the estate, which sale he was advised was illegal, fraudulent and void, and was not made according to the deed. And he contends that he is in the attitude of a fair purchaser for a valuable consideration without notice. He further charges that the suit, though in the name of Prentiss, is for the benefit of Haggin as to the whole or part of the land in contest, and makes Haggin a defendant, in his answer in the nature of a cross bill, and requires him to answer these allegations as respects himself. *25 February 1, 1819, White filed an amended answer, in which he charges that Thomas G. Prentiss, the pretended complainant, had absconded and left the state, and as he, White, believed had little or no interest in the suit, but it was carried on for the benefit of Haggin and perhaps others unknown. And he makes his answer a cross bill against both Prentiss and Haggin, and requires their answer--He insists that Haggin is the party materially interested, and was interested by an understanding or agreement between him and Prentiss at the time of the pretended sale, and that understanding or agreement was either verbal or reduced to writing and he requires its production. And he propounds numerous interrogations, in almost every imaginable form, to extract either from Haggin or Prentiss the nature of Haggin's interest, as well as that of Prentiss, and when or how the contract was between them. He denies that either Prentiss or Haggin had paid anything for the estate; and insists that the sale was colorable, and intimates that James Prentiss or others were interested in the purchase, and requires by divers interrogatories a disclosure on this point. He requires an explicit answer whether this suit is not carried on without the knowledge or consent of T. G. Prentiss, and was not the bill and every paper filed in the suit written by Haggin, and did he intend to let Prentiss have any benefit from the controversy. And he requires a discovery of every one interested in the management or proceeds of the suit, and requires Prentiss to disclose whether he ever advised the suit or knew of its existence. White's first amended answer and cross bill--charging the suit was for the benefit of Haggin and requiring his and complainants answer. To these charges and interrogatories of White, the complainant never answered; but on the 6th of March, 1822, his death is suggested on the record, and an order made reviving the suit in the names of certain persons as heirs, without stating them infants. Prentiss fails to answer, and dies, and suit is revived in the name of his heirs. At the February term, 1822, on the motion of White Joseph Towler was appointed guardian ad litem, to defend and answer the answer of White in the nature of a cross bill, for the heirs of T. G. Prentiss, who are said to be infants. On the 20th of the same month, that guardian answers for the heirs, that "they have no knowledge touching the matters propounded in White's answer, by way of interrogatory, and therefore, can not admit, but must expect full proof thereof as far as deemed material." Answer of the guardian of complainants heirs to cross bill. At the same time Haggin answered, "that Williamson had been a number of years engaged in Nicholasville and Lexington, merchandising, ropemaking and exporting produce and becoming embarrassed in his pecuniary circumstances, at the request of his creditors and endorsers, and for their indemnity, executed the deed of trust or assignment set out in the bill. His failure being one of the first and greatest produced by the late disastrous times in that quarter, the assignment or conveyance of his estate, soon acquired, as was believed very great publicity. The deed of trust was made and soon recorded. Sales were several times published by the trustees and again suspended, in conformity to the orders of creditors. That he considered Williamson had many friends who purchased tickets in the lottery, and acted under the influence of a desire to relieve him from his difficulties, and a reliance upon his personal exertions to indemnify them, and they were not supposed ignorant of his condition, and the incumbrances upon his property, and therefore, although apprized of the lottery, and in town while it was drawing, he (Haggin) did not deem it necessary to interfere. He did not believe he was present at the drawing, nor did he purchase a ticket. But at the time he would not have feared to give Williamson credit for the price of several. Indeed, he afterwards became Williamson's security to the amount of about seven hundred dollars, which he was compelled to pay. He did not believe that Williamson was paid with any punctuality by those who purchased tickets in his lottery, not even by the defendant White, and Williamson resorting to law to recover the price of his tickets, the courts decided against him and he failed. *26 Haggin's answer to White's cross bill. He (Haggin) disavowed any encouragement to the lottery, but admits that on his way to the court house, about the time the drawing was to commence, he witnessed an unpleasant altercation between Mr. Trotter and Williamson, which as a mutual friend, he endeavored to suppress. Trotter threatened a publication by handbill, which Williamson considered hostile, and which he seemed determined to resent accordingly. Trotter's ostensible object, was the communication of a lien which he professed to hold on a house and lot in the scheme, for a lottery and he (Haggin) supposing the condition of the title such, and so well known, that Trotter's right could not be impaired, and really suspecting Trotter's object was an attack upon Williamson's feelings to extort from him a payment, even more than due, he interposed, not supposing that Trotter's publication would produce any effect upon the lottery. The tickets had been sold and the facts were presumed to be known. Williamson's credit was not gone, and most who essayed in the measure, hoped the proceeds would redeem Williamson, and secure to them the prizes. These efforts failing to raise money, the trustees were required to sell. The trustees were slow to interfere, and were for a while enjoined. At length the court dissolved the injunction, under circumstances indicating it as a duty with the trustees to make a sale. They accordingly advertised. Williamson had drawn most of the valuable prizes himself, and most of the others were of little moment. That it occurred to him, the defendant, Haggin, that an adjustment of every difficulty might be effected by the presence of the few who had been fortunate, and he took therefore, some pains, that the defendant, White should have notice, and sent him a request to be there. His son came before the sale, and he, Haggin, went with him to the complainant, Prentiss, who had the superintendence of the largest debts, and perhaps to others with a sincere desire that a compromise should be effected. He was aware, that as doubts were entertained as to the title of the property, it might sell at a sacrifice. The son of White then represented himself as authorized to sell, and proposed selling to him, (Haggin,) and likewise to engage him on a very liberal contingent fee. He then told the son, he would give him one of two lots then shown, for his claim, with an expectation of suppressing further controversy; for he did not doubt the creditors would compensate him.--But he was not disposed to make any engagements as an attorney, until the sale was over. At the sale the son bid; but Thomas G. Prentiss offered more, and became the purchaser. For whom Prentiss purchased, execpt for himself, he, (Haggin) had no knowledge. For he expressly denied that he had any communication with him, directly on indirectly, or any understanding, or any intimation at any time before the sale, on the subject of a participation in the sale. Indeed, he considered Prentiss and his counsel, too much dissatisfied with him (Haggin) for deferring the sale so long. He did not believe or admit, that the deed of trust was fraudulent, on the contrary, he knew it was required by the principal creditors, and believes it was made with an intention to secure to the creditors, as far as in his power, their just demands. *27 He can not admit that he offered the defendant White, sixteen thousand dollars, for the tract of land in contest, at a time when it was hoped that Williamson would be able to satisfy his trust creditors, and still succeed in business. He says written proposals for a purchase did pass between him and White, and he believed that White yet detained his letter containing them; for he, White, acknowledged not long since, that he held it, and was requested to preserve it; but he did not expect it would ever be produced, because his proposal, as he believes, fell greatly short of that sum--nor does he doubt that his proposal was predicated upon the idea of a warranty of the title by White. That he often conversed with White on the subject, he believed before the conveyance was made, he is confident it was before the price of the ticket was paid, and nothing short of a positive denial could cause him to doubt that he was apprized of the deed of trust as early as their first interview. He admits that several of the papers filed in the suit, are in his hand writing--some appeared to be written by White's counsel, and some by others, and why the interrogatory on that subject he could not understand. He was sure the counsel of White knew the hand writing, and that it was known to the court, and would not be disguised or denied. He repeats his denial of the slightest interest at the sale to Prentiss, and acknowledges that he afterwards undertook to prosecute the claim of Prentiss upon terms and contingencies which he was not disposed to state, and he presumed it would not be required. That for the notes of Prentiss, on which he, Haggin, and John T. Mason, were endorsers, to an amount exceeding seven thousand dollars, more probably nine, he made an agreement with Mason to pay him a sum exceding three thousand dollars, he thinks upwards of thirty-five hundred, and gave up all demands on the notcs lifted as aforesaid, for the interest of Prentiss, in all his purchase, except one house and lot. For that contract he had particularly examined on that morning, (when he drew the answer) and could not find it, and therefore presumed it to be in the possession of Mason. That he was not able to speak very definitely, either as to the amount of the notes paid, or the sums paid on them. For, several years had since elapsed, without any motive for bearing it in mind; Mason paid a part of the notes, but he, Haggin, was strongly impressed, that the sums were not exaggerated. The purchase of Prentiss exclusive of the house and lot, included another tract of 100 acres, adjoining the one in contest, claimed by others, under the lottery as aforesaid--another house and lot and some small pieces of property of no great value. He further stated that he might be mistaken, but he believed the full amount of Prentiss' purchase has been paid to the creditors, and the obligations cancelled accordingly. He denied that he ever offered to release or convey to White, for one half, or upon any other terms, previous to the sale to Prentiss; nor did he believe that he ever offered it; and although previous and subsequent conversations had taken place on the subject of compromise, and he believed the proposals had since been made, and not such as alleged in the answer of White. *28 He further states that this suit was instituted more immediately under the direction of James Prentiss, whom he believed to be an authorized agent. That he did not know who were aiders and abettors with Prentiss, or what interest James Prentiss had in the purchase. The aiders of himself were the trustees, or some of them and he knew no terms with Thomas, James, on any other person for them. On the 27th of February, 1822, the defendant, White, tendered another amended answer, which was objected to; but leave to file it was granted. It gives the following relation: White's second amended answer and cross bill. That he purchased the ticket in the lottery without knowing that he violated any law, and with a view to enable Williamson to pay his debts. The charge of fraud in the deed of trust is repeated. That Williamson was largely indebted to others besides those named in the deed, and the deed was had and contrived to hinder and delay his creditors, in their remedies against him, and the statement in the deed as made between the trustees and creditors, was a mere shift and devise, to give color to the transaction, and such creditors were no parties to the deed, and very few, if any were consulted or gave their consent, and if any did they were induced to do so, under the unjust and unlawful references attempted to be given them in the deed. That Williamson was, by the trustees permitted to hold, and enjoy the property, and sell and dispose of i?? as his own, and the trustees never did take possession of, or sell any of the personal estate at Orleans, at Augusta (Go.) and other places described in the deed; but permitted Williamson to sell and dispose of it as his own, and not one cent of the proceeds had ever been applied by the trustees, to the payment of his debts; but so long as the whole property was useful and convenient to Williamson, they permitted him to remain the sole proprietor and disposer of it, not only by lottery and otherwise, but to apply it to the support of his family expenses, and his own extravagant and dissipated habits of life. That not until he had raised large sums throughout the state, by sales of tickets to innocent purchasers, in what his advisers called a scheme for the distribution of property, and his delayed and defrauded creditors pressed him with judgments and executions, did the trustees take upon themselves to interfere with the property, and then, so far only as is hereafter detailed. That they then only pretended to sell the lands, and the whole was purchased by Prentiss, and was now claimed by Haggin, except one house and lot on Poplar row, and that held by favorites, who drew it in the lottery, and then gave a small colorable sum to the trustees. That the real estate contracted for by Haggin, would at the date of the deed of trust, have commanded between thirty and forty thousand dollars, and the personal estate perhaps double that sum, had it not been drawn or covered from the creditors. *29 That not one fair and bona fide creditor had been paid by the trustees out of the estate. That at a time when the late Kentucky Insurance Company was in existence, and before its insolvency, Williamson became its debtor, and Thomas G. Prentiss and James Prentiss were reputed general partners in estate in Lexington and James contained in the names of certain individuals, to gain a majority of votes in that bank, by which he ultimately got the entire control of it, and caused the said Thomas, his brother and partner, to be made president. That during his presidency, notes on the bank to an enormous amount, were issued--an old box containing some thirty thousand dollars of notes taken in and laid by, under a former board of directors, was broken open and re-issued. The bills receivable were delivered to said James by said Thomas, and assigned and sold by James for his own use, and that of said Thomas. That after these mal-practices were carried on, said Thomas took upon himself to act for the company, and became the purchaser of the property in contest; and shortly after he made the purchase, at the pretended sale, made by Haggin and others--these fraudulent transactions through this bank, by its failure, and the immense amount of notes out, and the cash in its vault disappearing, and other facts, became public, and the said James made his flight by land to the East, and the said Thomas took water, descended the Mississippi, and never again returned, having died, leaving children, who knew nothing of this suit. That since, the bank was dissolved, and even the books were inaccessible; that notes of that bank fell to ten cents in the dollar, and many thousands remained unpaid that would not command even that sum. That the whole payment, or the greater part thereof, if any had been made by Haggin, had been made in the notes of that bank, at their nominal amount of mere nominal value, and acquired by him since the flight of the two brothers named Prentiss, and the insolvency of the bank, for none of which could he have given more than twenty-five cents in the dollar. That neither Haggin or any of the other trustees, had paid any other creditor one dollar, on account of these pretended sales, except in Insurance notes. In fact, they had not settled and adjusted a debt of Williamson, except that Haggin may have used some of its notes to balance accounts with it, after he knew it was dissolved, and after he knew that its president and his partner in this insurance drama had eloped; all which charges were well known to all the trustees. He then makes these charges a cross bill, and annexes the following interrogatories: Had they paid any creditor of Williamson? If so, to whom, and when, and in what? Did they take possession or make sale of Williamson's estate until after his lottery, and until he was pressed by judgments and executions? Did they not permit him to use and dispose of the personal estate, and did they not know, that he had sold and made away with it? If not, what had become of it? Did they make any exertions to get possession of the property, and if so, when, and what exertions did they make? What debts did Haggin ever pay for the estate he claimed under T. G. Prentiss? In what, and when, did, he pay? Were the rest of the trustees consulted, and did they severally agree to these payments? To say by several and distinct answers--did the rest consent that Haggin should become the paymaster for Prentiss, and did the rest surrender or cancel Prentiss' notes, or had they been consulted on the subject? Were there not creditors to a great number and amount, to whom they had not paid a farthing? Had they any idea of the amount of Williamson's debts? If so, state what it is. Had they any written consent of the creditors to the conveyance to them? If, so, to state from whom, and file it. Did they not know that Williamson offered the land in contest for sale by the lottery? Did they not all reside in the same town where the lottery was drawn, and did they ever express their disapprobation thereof? And if so, to whom? Did not they severally, and especially January and Williamson, as much as in them lay, try to dispose of his tickets and complete his lottery? *30 Interrogatories put by White to Haggin, &c. On the 17th of December, 1822, January filed his answer to the interrogatories, and several cross bills of White--as follows: January, one of the trustees--his answer to White's second amended cross bill. That he had undertaken the trust, and did not find it convenient to pay to it that minute and close attention which was requisite on the part of the other trustees, and had generally prevailed on others to attend to the details, still uniting with them in its principal duties. He had, therefore, no knowledge on the subject of the accounts, which would enable him to state what sums had been collected, and to whom paid, or by whom detained, and referred this to his co-defendants. That he had certainly acted in good faith in relation to the creditors, and considered the other trustees governed by the same motives. The object of the deed was to secure just creditors, and he believed the object of all concerned was the same, and none intended a fraud upon any. He knew very little of the debts of Williamson, except those named in the deed; nor did he know that Williamson misapplied the trust estate to the use of himself and family. Under the direction and authority of the trustees, Williamson went to Natchez and Orleans, and in other respects co-operated with the trustees; but he had not understood that Williamson had perverted the proceeds, and he still believed him faithful, and supposed that he paid the trustees the amount of the means in his charge. He did not intend that either Williamson or the sheriff should dispose of the estate conveyed in trust, otherwise than according to the deed, and he did not recollect a levy by an officer. In relation to the lottery, he heard some altercation between Williamson and Trotter, and as their mutual friend, endeavored to reconcile the parties, and not to sanction the lottery. And he did not suppose it necessary that the trustees should say or do any thing on the subject. The deed was of record, and he supposed known; and he considered the purchasers of tickets as contributing to the relief of Williamson, relying on his exertions to redeem himself and his estate from the deed, and he felt no interest in the matter. He admitted the sale to Prentiss, and that he paid a part to the Insurance Company, which was a large creditor of Prentiss; but the sum paid, to whom paid, or in what, he could not say. He knew of no fraud in the transaction, and denied that any was chargeable to him: Nor did he know how the house and lot on Poplar row, which Haggin did not claim, was held; and he admits the utter failure of the Insurance Company. On the 17th of February, 1823, Hunt files his next answer, in which he repeats that Williamson had been largely engaged in trade, particularly in the purchase and exportation of produce, and proving ultimately much embarrassed, and being about to make an assignment for the benefit of creditors, he, Hunt, assented to become one of the trustees, and the deed was accordingly executed. That as far as relates to himself the transaction was fair and bona fide; for he intended to satisfy just creditors, and not defraud any. He knows many of the creditors were consulted before the measure was adopted, and he understood them to desire it, otherwise he would not have participated. He can not state who were, or were not present, at the execution of the deed; but believes most, if not all, of them were there. Having matters of his own commanding most of his time, he submitted the duties to one or more of his co-trustees, never having received any of the effects, nor kept any account, although he was frequently, and he believes generally consulted and acquiesced in every important measure. He believes the deed of trust was soon recorded after its execution. *31 Hunt's answer to the same. Williamson was soon dispatched to Orleans, as the agent of the trustees, to superintend the settlement of his concerns in that quarter; but he believes ?? result was very unfortunate; his shipments (conveyed by the deed), producing very little; yet he must leave it to his co-defendant, Haggin, to shew the precise state of these funds. He never did understand that Williamson had applied any portion of them to his own use. He denies any interest or agency in the lottery. He did know of it; but the deed of trust being recorded, the failure and consequent assignment of Williamson being a matter of considerable notoriety and the publication of intended sales by the trustees, preceding the lottery, rendered it unnecessary in his mind to say or do more. Touching the sale to Prentiss, he admits it, but can not say any thing which he deems material. He presumes his co-defendants, Worsley and Haggin, could best show the payments were made, if important in this cause. The Insurance Company was a very large creditor of Williamson, as would appear by the deed, and in what it was paid, he did not know, nor could he suppose it to be material to the trustees. He has reason to believe that institution was improperly closed, and knows its paper depreciated, and that Thomas G. Prentiss was its president. The period or rates of depreciation he could not specify. That he himself suffered a heavy loss by Williamson, believing in the fairness of the deed of trust. He did not know what arrangements were made with the house on Poplar row. On the same day, the defendants, Worsley, and Haggin, filed a joint answer, to which Haggin made oath and Worsley did not. They state that Williamson having proved unfortunate in trade, convened most of his creditors, and all known to these defendants, and within a convenient distance, and made to the trustees the conveyance of the estate therein expressed, with the united consent and desire of the creditors, as they believe; and believing the measure to be done in good faith to secure his creditors, by Williamson, and that the creditors so desired, they undertook the duties of trustees or assignees, as set forth in that instrument. So far as they know or believe, the deed was executed for the just purpose to secure creditors, and not with an intent to defraud, delay or hinder creditors or others. Worsley and Haggin's joint answer. They admit that Williamson was largely indebted; but do not admit that his debts were considerable, exclusive of those provided for by the deed. They do not admit that they permitted Williamson to use the property, as his own, or for the support of himself and family. On the contrary, although he had an agency in the sales of much of the preperty, they had the superintendence, and have, no doubt, the whole amount of the effects sold by him, was applied in satisfaction of the debts provided for by the deed of trust. They state that, immediately after the execution of the deed, understanding that the effects at Orleans required immediate attention, and confiding in the integrity of Williamson, they, with the other trustees, appointed him their agent, and dispatched him to that quarter, giving notice to those who had his property in charge, of the assignment; and they were very certain that Williamson acted, avowedly, under the authority derived from them, and in no instance had they reason to believe did he assume an independent control of the effects at Augusta, at Natchez or Orleans. He received but little, which he remitted, and in the summer returned, leaving his matters there in a very embarrassed condition, the produce yielding but little. It was chiefly in the hands of Duncan & M'Call, with whom they had never been able to effect a settlement; one of whom was said, long since to be dead; and for many years past a suit against them had been depending on the part of the trustees, and how it might terminate they did not know, nor did they presume it to be material to White, or his representatives. *32 They do not admit the right of White to call them to account for the distribution of the effects conveyed to them for the creditors. They considered the property conveyed to secure creditors, and, therefore, did not take upon themselves greater trouble and attention to it, than they supposed would conduce to that end; consequently, while the creditors were willing, and the property seemed secure in the hands of Williamson, they did not interfere. But they could not have felt themselves justified to permit Williamson, or the officer, to sell for other purposes. It was not true that they exercised no control until creditors levied, nor do they recollect any attempt on the part of the creditors to levy upon this property. They were required by the creditors, or some of them, to sell in the spring, after the date of the deed; and they advertised, but the sale was postponed by the request of the creditors. It was a second time advertised and deferred. The publicity attending the failure of Williamson, who did a very extensive business, the recording of the deed of trust, the frequency with which the subject was mentioned wherever he was known, and the several advertisements in the newspapers, left no doubt with them, that all, by any means conversant with Williamson, were apprised of the conveyance and assignment to them. That although they were apprised of the lottery, they did not suppose those who purchased tickets were ignorant of the previous deed; nor that it was necessary for them, in justice, to give any notice. Indeed they were not apprised how they would or should have given notice. They were at length compelled to sell, in pursuance of the deed, and Prentiss became the purchaser of the real estate, by no means equal to the satisfaction of the debts provided for by the deed. What contracts he made with others, they, except Haggin, only knew from report, and Haggin referred to his former answer upon that subject. They believed large sums had been paid, and a part of the insurance notes; but they believed, that, at the time of the sale and payment, those notes were very valuable, although somewhat doubted at first, and ultimately of very little worth. The Insurance Company was a large creditor, and they do not suppose it is expected of them to render an account of all the creditors, proceeds and payments, provided for, collected and paid over, and as it would be a troublesome vask, they then decline it. That the sale to Prentiss was not on their part so far as they know or believe, a pretence, but a fair and bona fide transaction. That they understood that William T. Barry held the house, on Poplar row, by purchase from Prentiss, and sold it to the Bank of the United States, and that Haggin claimed a considerable portion of the residue of the real estate, having paid for Prentiss and for Mason, and assumed to pay the purchase money, and about the sum of three thousand five hundred dollars above it. Of these facts, however, Worsley did not speak positively. That they do not believe that the real estate (responsible as the town property was for the purchase money), worth half the sum mentioned by White, nor that the personalty commanded half that amount. *33 Touching the concerns of the insurance company, of which Thomas G. Prentiss was for a while the president, and in which James Prentiss was said to have great negotiations, they alleged they were not able to render any satisfactory account. They knew that it subsequently failed, yet they had no doubt the demand against Williamson was just, and the sale and purchase fair. They could not admit that the institution was dissolved, when Haggin made the payments. They, except Haggin, desired the funds received by him to be paid over agreeably to the terms of the deed of trust, and the proceeds from the sale of the lands to be applied accordingly; and the defendant Haggin said that he paid, as he believed, in conformity thereto the full amount of Prentiss' purchase. That the notes were left with Worsley, and given up when payments were perfected. That the creditors were not all satisfied. That they did know of the lottery and took no measure to ratify or suppress it, for the reasons already given, and really believed, the purchasers of tickets to purchase with a knowledge of the deed and with a reliance on the exertions of Williamson to remove the incumbrances. At the February term, 1823, the heirs of White excepted to these answers of January, Worsley, Hunt and Haggin, by numerous exceptions, which are not necessary to be recited; suffice it to say, that the exceptions were, that the answers were not explicit in response to the interrogatories of White, and had omitted to answer many of them altogether. The court sustained these exceptions, determined these answers insufficient, and directed them all to answer over. Exceptions to the answers to White's interrogatories in his cross bill, sustained and held correctly. None of them made further answer, except Haggin, who, on the 2d July, 1823, filed an amended answer, wherein he states, that it is true this suit is prosecuted for his benefit, and he had again made search for his contract, but could not find it, and he therefore, believed it in possession of Mason. That he could not set forth with precision, the amount in specie, which the estate of Williamson, purchased by Prentiss, and ultimately by himself, had cost him. That he believed he had paid the nominal amount, but chiefly to the insurance company, that institution being entitled to it by the deed of trust, and in the notes of the institution, a part of which were furnished by Mason--a part he, Haggin, purchased at par upon credit--the residue he obtained at a discount, not less than thirty-three, nor more than sixty-six, and the proportions of paper which he purchased at either rate, except that which he bought at par, he had no means by which he could give any thing like a definite statement. The amount he bought at par, he believes was about two thousand dollars, and the whole cost to him, he thinks, may be fairly computed at nine thousand dollars. Haggin's farther answer. He still protests against the right of White or his representatives, to call him to account for the trust estate, or its proceeds, therefore, he would not attempt a detailed account, nor did he presume it would be required. He would, however, say, that many of the debts had been entirely satisfied, and partial payments had been made of others. That he did not believe the payments made upon the demands specified in the deed, and of the avails of the effects embraced by that instrument, would fall short of twenty-five thousand dollars; yet, he had no doubt that some of the creditors remained without the first cent; for the demands were not of equal dignity, as would be seen by the deed of trust. *34 This respondent did not lay his hand upon the effects conveyed by the deed; but the trustees immediately assumed a superintendence and control. Williamson acted in the settlement of accounts, and in the collection of the dues, and in the sale of the effects under the direction of the trustees. The payments were chiefly made, likewise, so far as made, through Williamson, and under the direction of the trustees, and the application of the trust effects to the use of himself and family were not admitted. But, that on the contrary he believed, that he applied agreeably to the provisions of the deed, the full amount of his receipts. That he could not say what was the conversation between him and the co-trustees, on the subject of his paying the amount of Prentiss' debt, for the purchase of the property sold in virtue of the deed. He presumed they were apprized of it, and could not yet doubt that it met their approbation, the payment corresponding with the provisions of the deed. But he hoped it would be recollected, that it was a considerable time since the transaction took place, and he was incapable of a distinct recollection of consultations and conversations about a matter which he never supposed important. Williamson's debts of the first grade were paid, and but one sentiment he supposed, could be entertained touching its propriety. That he had, no doubt, that the trustees, or some of them, did consent to the cancelment of Prentiss' notes upon the payment of their amount, upon the debt due the institution by Williamson; for he though they were once in the charge of Worsley. That it still seemed to be their duty to surrender them upon these terms, and he could see no motive they had to object. That he had never attempted the computation of the debts of Williamson, except those specified in the deed of trust, nor did he suppose his knowledge touching such debts, would be of service to White's representatives, but he did not consider them heavy. That he did not recollect that any of the creditors manifested their assent to the deed by writing, at the time of its execution. But he believed most of them expressed it orally. That he had no memorandum of the meeting of the creditors, upon the execution of the deed, but could say that he was impressed that most of them convened. He then named about five or six of the creditors secured by the deed, whom he recollected as convening at that time. The foregoing is a full abstract of the pleadings. The evidence has been noticed in the opinion already delivered, or in that which follows, except one or two facts, which will be added. It is shewn that sundry proposals passed between White and Haggin, with regard to this estate, before this suit was brought, in all of which Haggin acted as the owner of the estate. The proofs. One witness deposed, that Prentiss informed him on the day of sale, that he had purchased for the insurance company, and Haggin he thinks, was present. Col. Richard Taylor deposed, that he was chosen, and acted as a manager of the lottery; and thinks, but is not certain, that Worsley and January were present at the drawing, and did not forbid the drawing. That he heard nothing said or spoken of that day, about any deed of trust or lien on the estate set up as prizes, nor had he any idea of any. The drawing took place in Lexington, where all the trustees resided. *35 We have been more minute in reciting the pleadings in the cause, in order that its features may be fully understood, especially as the zealous and learned counsel concerned, has earnestly, but respectfully urged upon the court, a full review of its features, and has insisted that the first decree is based upon mistaken principles, or a mistake of the facts. Few causes have cost the court more labor and research, or have occupied a greater share of its deliberations. Indeed, it has been a cause of a privileged character. It was heard at first out of turn, on written arguments only, and the decree pronounced. History of the case in this court. In answer to a petition for a re-hearing, the prayer thereof was granted. It was argued a second time, and the first decree approved. But a third argument was applied for, and because the appellees were not heard on the second argument, owing to singular and extraordinary reasons and circumstances, not necessary to be related, the last opinion affirming the first, was entirely withdrawn, and the order sustaining the first decree rescinded, and the cause left still on the rehearing, and it has been fully and ably re-argued on both sides, and we have now to decide whether the first decree is to stand unaltered, or to be rescinded. We mention these circumstances, not that the frequent re-hearing may become a precedent; but rather to prevent them being so hereafter; and hesitate not to say, that we will grant no such indulgence to other causes. Re-hearing--Practice in this court. It is insisted, on the part of the appellants, that the deed of trust executed by Williamson, is fraudulent and void, so much so that White or his representatives can take advantage of it, and that in its behalf the chancellor ought not to interfere. Grounds relied on by White's heirs. That the title of White is a valid title, and having the legal estate, he has got it meritoriously, or so much so that he can repel the claim of the complainant's below, in which there is no merit; and that as he has acquired the legal estate without notice, he is entitled to hold it. That the title set up by the complainants has no merit. That the sale by the trustees to Thomas G. Prentiss, was collusive and derogatory to the rights of others--that it was for the benefit of Haggin, or for individual benefit, and not for the benefit of creditors; that no money was paid, and that this bill is in fact for the benefit of Haggin, one of the trustees, and not the bill of Prentiss; and that Haggin claims the estate by some unexplained contract with Prentiss, without payment, and that there is too great a mystery over this title to permit a court of equity to lend its aid in drawing the estate from White, and that the conduct of the trustees deluded the ticket holders in the lottery. On the other side it is contended, that the deed of trust is valid, and that White or his representatives, do not stand in an attitude to question its validity, as it is binding on Williamson, and those claiming under him. *36 Grounds relied on by the heirs of Prentiss. That the title of White is acquired by a species of gaming, and is, therefore, invalid and immoral, and such as he ought to surrender to Williamson or his aliences. That White has no right to impeach the title of the plaintiffs, or to call the trustees to an account of their actings and doings in the trust; that the sale to Prentiss was fair, and without mystery, or concealment; that the bill is to be treated exclusively as the bill of Prentiss, and he as a bona fide purchaser from the trustees; that his representatives can not be affected by the acts of Haggin, or his answers in this cause, to the interrogatories of White. And that the acts of the trustees in conniving at this estate going into the lottery, can not affect Prentiss, a purchaser under them, because the trustees acted for creditors, and sold the estate to Prentiss, who is a purchaser under the creditors, and no act of the trustees, with regard to the lottery could prejudice the rights of the creditors for whom they act. These different points present at least a sketch of the matters of controversy debated at the bar; and some of them will now receive our serious consideration. We shall not enquire minutely into the merits of the deed of trust, and whether it be or be not fraudulent as to creditors, because we do not deem it necessary to a correct decision of the cause. If it be conceded that the particular creditors secured by the deed, chose their trustees; that Williamson agreed to give them the preference; and that each one, as well as Williamson, without any fraudulent intent, agreed to every feature of the deed, (which is as favorable a ground as the transaction can be placed on), it then follows, that the trustees do represent the creditors, and can act for them, and bind them, at least to some extent-- and that the trustees alone, need be parties to any transaction to bind the creditors. But will it thence follow, that this estate is of a priviledged order; and that the trustees may sport with it as they please, or allow Williamson to do so, and to delude others therewith, and yet the estate be in no danger of loss, because, that the concern of the creditors will compel deluded purchasers to abide by all the consequences of the deception? Is not an estate conveyed by debtor to trustees for creditors subject to loss by the fraud of trustees, and debtor on a bona fide purchaser from the debtor, without creditors participation? To illustrate this, we will suppose, that White had been about to purchase this estate, at an auction made by Williamson, at which the trustees attended-- That White should have understood, that the legal title was in Saunders, who was willing to convey, on receiving the balance of the purchase money; and that Williamson held Saunders' bond--That White had advised with the trustees in a friendly manner, as to the propriety of his making his purchase, and that they should have encouraged, and held out inducements to him to make the purchase; and that he should have done so, and paid up to Saunders the purchase money due him, and to Williamson the residue of his price, and received his conveyance, and surrendered the bond of Saunders to him; and that so soon as he had completed his purchase and parted with his money, the trustees should draw from their pockets, their equity held by their deed of trust, (and they hold but an equity), till this moment concealed from, and unknown to White, and should demand the estate from him, and bring their bill in chancery to enforce it; and White was to rely on this fraud, could they shield themselves from its effects by replying, that they represented creditors, and as the creditors were not guilty of the deception, White could not complain? *37 If trustees to an equity conveyed by debtors for his creditors encourage and induce a stranger to purchase the estate from the debtor, and he does so pay for it, and obtains the legal title from debtor's vendors where it had remained, he shall not be disturbed. To this it may be answered, that he would here shield himself by the plea of an innocent purchase, for a valuable consideration, without notice.--To which we reply, that the very fact of his being enable to do so, proves that the trustees, when they come into contact with strangers, are in some measure at least, subjected to the same rules which govern other holders of title, or other complainants in chancery, when they get without the trust family, and deal with strangers. But we will strip White of the legal estate, and say that in the purchase in which we have supposed, he acquired an equity only, and was induced to part with his money to obtain it, by the representations of the trustees, and that they were afterwards to produce their equity against his, and claim that theirs was held for creditors, and was oldest; which ought to be prefered? And could he be made to loose notwithstanding the deception they had practised? The answer to this enquiry in the negative, as it must be answered, will shew that trustees are not exempted from the conscientious rules of conduct which govern other individuals when they deal with strangers. In that case, their consciences may be reached as well as others, and they, and those they represent, must often abide by the consequences. Trustees in dealing with strangers, are in the general, governed by the same rules as the holder of the absolute estate, and by their deception may lose the property. We acknowledge the rule as laid down by Cruise, and relied on in argument, "that no act of a trustee shall prejudice the cestui que trust; nor shall the forbearance of trustees in not doing what it was their office to have done, prejudice the cestui que trust; since, at that rate, it would be in the power of the trustees, either by doing or delaying to do their duty, to affect the rights of others." 1 Cruise Dig. 541. But this rule applies exclusively between the cestui que trust and the trustees, or persons dealing with the trustee as such, and having notice of, or claiming under the trust, and is not universally true as regards strangers, and the cases cited by Cruise, 3 Peer. Will. 214, and 2, Peer. Will. 706, prove this restricted application of the rule, and are decisions between the trustee and cestui que trust, or those claiming the benefit of the trust. The rule that no act or neglect of the trustees, shall prejudice the cestui que trust applies only to the parties to the trust, and those dealing with the trustees as such, having notice of, and claiming under the trust and not to the case of strangers. The exception as to strangers is acknowledged by the same author. A purchaser for a valuable consideration, without notice of the trust, as we have already seen, is acknowledged to be one discharged from the claims of the cestui que trust. A trustee is said to be barred by a fine and by the statute of limitations, as other claimants are against strangers. *38 Executors and administrators are trustees representing the estate of the decedent, and the interest of creditors and infants; and yet they are bound by the same morality, and the same rules of fairness and propriety in their dealings with strangers, as other individuals, and after they lose the estate by their supineness or their fraud with strangers, and feel the effects of their conduct in their responsibility to those they represent. It is true, a purchaser from a trustee with notice of the trust, is in some cases, compelled to see to the appropriation of the purchase money. But in this case, he is a purchaser with notice under the trust; in other words, he has voluntarily, to some extent, substituted himself in the place of the trustee, and of course bears some relation to the cestui que trust. Purchaser from a trustee as such, is in some cases, as a trustee in respect of the price, and must see its application. Property may be lost to cestui que trust by the negligence of the trustees, or their fraud in deluding strangers to purchase it. White obtained the legal title without notice of the conveyance in trust. If property can be forever lost to the trustee and cestui que trust also, and become the property of another, by mere negligence, delay or lapse of time, is it against the rules of either equity or law, to subject them to the same loss, when they have connived at placing it in the hands of strangers, by deception or delusion? Certainly not. We will now pay some attention to the title acquired by White. It is clear legal estate, and the possession united. It is true, he got it by becoming a purchaser of a ticket in a lottery, and drew it as a prize; but got it with total ignorance of the equity claimed by the trustees under their deed. We do not admit that he obtained the estate in violalation of the laws of the land, although we may not be able to applaud his morality in the adventure. There was no statute in force against this lottery at the time the tickets were sold, and the prizes drawn, except the acts 1769 and 1779, 5 Litt. L. K. 587, 589, and neither of these acts impose any penalty on the purchasers of tickets in private lotteries. They are not supposed to be guilty of any offense, and on the makers of such lotteries alone, the penalty is imposed. Hence, there is no such thing as applying the doctrines which affect particeps criminis to their case. No penalty was imposed by the acts of 1769 and 1779, on the purchaser of tickets in private lotterieis, and they were not participes criminis with the makers of the lottery--on these all the penalties were imposed. They are not in pari delictu with the seller of the tickets, or those who aid and encourage him. If he receives the money, it may be recovered back. If they fail to pay it, he can not coerce it. The purchaser, therefore, is rather treated as the favorite of the law--the party whom the law meant to protect against the effects of private lotteries. If, therefore, any ticket holder gets hold of his prize, these acts furnish no means of getting it back, either in a court of law or equity. *39 It remains yet to be decided, what grade of title, the estate acquired by White belongs to, and who can compel him to surrender it. Certainly Williamson could not. The prizes drawn in such lotteries were lawfully held. We would not be understood as deciding whether White's title could, or could not be reached in favor of trustees or creditors, to whom the equity therein, had been conveyed, in case he had got the title without their consent or approbation--for such a case is not before us. We can not assent to the position that White is such a holder of the title, as can not be allowed to enquire into the merits of his adversaries claim, and dispute with them the fairness of their demand. He has the legal estate derived from the same person under whom the trustees claim, and that estate is good against Williamson. Can another claiming under Williamson, therefore, estop him from enquiring into the merits of their claim, and are they not compelled to come into court with clean hands as well as other suitors? Certainly they are, and White has the right to see that they are clean, and he would have that right, standing in the attitude of a defendant, and holding the possession, although he had acquired his claim by swindling and fraud. This gives him a right to enquire to some extent, into the merits of the deed of trust. One who acquired the title and possession of land as a prize in a private lottery, might allege a deed of trust made by the maker of the lottery under which complainant claims an elder equity, was made in fraud of creditors. If they present themselves in the attitude of trustees for meritorious creditors whose interests were secured by the deed, he has a right to contest the fact, and to retort that they are a set of men combined with Williamson, not to secure, but to defraud the rights of creditors; that all is a combination to impose upon and cheat others, instead of paying the debts due to them; and for this purpose he has a right to avail himself of all proper inferences, which can be drawn from any of their acts in conducting the trust. So they might also allege the trustees had permitted the estate to be held out as a lure to him to make the adventure. Besides, if their claim was originally intended to secure and not to defraud creditors, he has a right to charge them with such malconduct in managing the trust as would lose to them the estate forever, by shewing that they have so managed the estate as to permit it be held up as a lure to deceive others, and induce them to risque their money for an interest in it, either legally or illegally, whereby some of it has really escaped, into his own hands, and then when they attempt to regain it, to prevent their doing so, and to leave them to the consequences of their imprudence. We would not be understood as deciding that White is one of those who can oppose this deed and procure it to be declared void under the act to prevent frauds and perjuries. This belongs to creditors alone whose rights are affected thereby. What we mean is, that standing in the attitude of a defendant, and deriving the legal estate from Saunders, he is not estopped by the deed of trust, to resist its effects upon him. He may show it to be a sham and not a reality--to be so managed as to delude him into a loss of his money, and after he had parted with that, to be used as a snare to catch the estate also. *40 The prize holder could not in such case have the deed of trust, cancelled; he could only resist its effects against him. A little attention to the facts concerning this lottery will shew that the conduct of the trustees in relation to it, was deceptive, and can not be justified, even if it be conceded that the deed was at first pure, and designed as a real security for creditors. The deed embraced a large estate, some personal and some real. The former was liable to perish or be wasted; the latter might be endangered because the title to part, as in the case of this farm, was incomplete and equitable only. The trustees by the execution and acceptance of the deed took the title and the right of possession, and their acceptance amounted to nothing less than a stipulation with the creditors, that they would safely preserve it, and dispose of it for the payment of debts. Williamson was to be no longer the owner; for he could not be trusted with it, and it is placed for this very reason into their safe keeping. If trustees of the estate conveyed by debtor for creditors, stand by and see the debtor publish a lottery of the property, sell the tickets, complete the drawing and collect the price of the tickets, the fortunate persons drawing and obtaining the possession of the prizes shall hold them. They soon after made him their agent and manager of the same estate, feeling a confidence in him as they state. Some time after his agency commences they see that by public advertisement he had engaged the very same property to the public at large, or at least to every one whom he could induce to buy a ticket, as prizes in a lottery for his own benefit. Of this scheme they are fully cognizant at every stage, and according to the most favorable statement made for themselves, they resolved to be silent and not interfere. What could have been their motives for this silence, and suffering this imposition to proceed against the laws of the land, and the creditors whom they represented? Could they have determined to let Williamson go on with the sport, and get all the money he could by this deception, which might do him some good, and to rest securely on their deed till it was over, and then by its power take back the estate, and open the eyes of the deluded purchasers of tickets to their cost? In such case does a sale at auction of the estate by the trustees to a creditor pass to the purchaser an equity the trustees had forfeited or could not assert? We will not impute this to them; but only say--what they seem to admit--that they intended to let Williamson proceed, and if he got money enough to discharge his debts, then the trust would be useless, and they would be discharged from its duties, which was their probable hope. But if he failed, then they could but exert their power under the deed, and take the estate from those who thought they had securely got it as prizes--a disagreeable part, no doubt, for the trustees, at last to act, if necessity compelled them. But it is one that is now attempted, and the question now is, has not this estate got beyond their reach? *41 We may add to all this, there was not only a tacit approbation of the lottery scheme, but two of them actually interfered to prevent the truth of the matter being made public, when threatened by a creditor; a strong evidence that they had authorized the lottery, and fostered its success, and took care that it should not be defeated. Under such circumstances, we can have no hesitation in saying, that if this was a controversy exclusively between the trustees and White, and if they had sued to recover back, on their equity, which had more than trifled with, the legal estate from White, who was one of the fortunate ticket holders, a court of equity ought to dismiss their bill and afford them no redress, however pure their equity might once have been. But since all this they have, and as they allege, at the request of the creditors, set up this estate at auction, now in the hands of White, and Thomas G. Prentiss has bid it off; and they have executed to him a writing evidencing his bill, saying nothing about the payment, but engaging to convey to him such estate as they hold under the deed, and he sues to regain the estate, and the question now arises, has this sale and bid by Prentiss, and certificate of the trustees so re-invigorated and revived this equity, once dead, in the hands of Prentiss, as to enable him to recover the estate, without these equity-killing acts of the trustees lying in his way? Or must he take the estate as they held it, affected by the same clog, or palsied by the same disease? This latter question was answered in the affirmative by the first opinion. Against this the arguments of counsel for the appellees have been principally directed as an erroneous assumption of principle by the court. An assignee of an equity takes it subject to any equity in the hands of others, and if that equity is the hands of the original grantor of the equity assigned, the rule is inflexible. It is a rule too well settled at this day to be questioned that the assignee of an equity, takes it subject to any equity against it, in the hands of others. If that opposing equity is in the hands of the original grantor of the equity assigned, the rule is inflexible, 2 Ver. 69, 764; 1 Peer. Wm's. 496; 1 Vez. 123. The only exception to the rule that we have met with is the case of an outstanding equity in a third person, which was kept a secret till the assignee had completed his purchase--an exception recognized in Murray, &c. v. Lilburn, &c. 2 John. Chy. Rep. 441. Where the equity is outstanding in a third person, and he conceals it till the assignee completes his purchase, it shall not prevail--But-- But to this exception the claim of White is not analogous. He holds the legal estate, and if it be admitted that he holds it without merit, still his claim is no secret and he has the repelling equity of the delusive conduct of the trustees touching the lottery, and it follows that he can assert it against Prentiss who purchased from the trustees. If Prentiss can claim an exemption from this repelling equity of White, it must be by shewing that ignorant of the circumstances, he had not only bought, but actually paid a valuable consideration. This he has not shewn, and we will soon see that this is an important ingredient lacking in the evidence of the complainant. *42 In such case the assignment must be for a valuable consideration and without notice. But it is insisted that the creditors are the real persons interested; that their equity accrued before White's title, that that title though acquired by White in ignorance of the claims of the creditors, yet it is not sufficiently meritorious to protect him, the want of notice notwithstanding; that they not having been shewn to have connived at and fostered the lottery, their rights are not affected thereby, and that Prentiss having purchased under a sale for their benefit, is clothed with their meritorious equity, and has a right to claim over the head of the improper acts of the trustees concerning the lottery. Argument for Prentiss on the ground that by his purchase he acquired the equity held by the creditors which had not been effected by the acts of the trustees--not allowed. This is the strongest attitude in which Prentiss can be placed, and its importance will be considered. The trustees do represent the creditors and can bind them by some of their acts and to some extent beyond a doubt. But we shall soon see that it is wholly immaterial whether they are bound by the acts of the trustees to lose this estate or not, or whether the trustees are the only proper parties to prosecute and defend their rights in courts or not, or whether decisions for or against the trustees will be conclusive on the creditors or not. On these points we will express no opinion, especially as the creditors are not parties. Either way, precisely the same consequences will follow. To entitle Prentiss to urge this argument he ought to shew not only that he had paid the purchase money but that it had been applied to the payment of the debts for which especially the trust was created. If the creditors are bound by the acts of the trustees, and this decision shall conclude their rights as far as to prevent them from touching their land, then their equity is lost in the hands of the trustees before the sale to Prentiss, and they are in no better situation by the acts of their representatives than these trustees themselves, who we have seen could not recover, and then there is an end of the question. If, on the contrary, the creditors are not affected by these acts of the trustees which we have disapproved, then it was incumbent upon Prentiss to shew that he was fully possessed of their equity; and how ought he to shew this? We answer by shewing that he had paid the money for their benefit--by seeing to its faithful and due appropriation, which he has utterly failed to do, either by proof or even by an explicit answer. The rule on that subject is well settled that where lands are conveyed in trust to sell for the payment of certain debts specified in the deed or instrument, the purchaser from the trustees must see to the appropriation of the purchase money, or his title will be inefficient against the creditors who are the cestui que trust. On the contrary if the conveyance is in trust with powers of sale for the payment of debts generally without specification, a purchaser under the trust is not bound to see to the appropriation of the purchase money. These doctrines will be found clearly settled by the following authorities. 1 Cruise Dig. 542, 543; 1 Vern. 260, 301; 1 Vez. 173. *43 Where lands are conveyed to be sold for payment of certain specified debts the purchaser must see to the appropriation of the money: Otherwise where the conveyance is for the payment of debts generally. Now this deed is not one for the securing and payment of debts generally, but the estate is to be sold for the payment of particular debts, every one specifically enumerated. It was, therefore, incumbent on every one claiming to be clothed with the claims of the creditors, to shew that he was indisputably possessed of their equity, by shewing the appropriation of the money to their benefit, especially in a case where the party relies on their claim as sufficient to exempt him from the acts of the trustees which deluded him into the lottery scheme, and caused him to part with the price of his ticket, as well as many others, whose money evidently went to pay the balance of the purchase money due from Williamson to Saunders, to procure the legal estate for White. Instead of shewing this, Prentiss has proved a naked bidding off of the estate, without a cent paid and appropriated to the debts of the creditors, and even the instrument of writing evidencing his purchase from the trustees does not pretend to state that he has either paid or secured the money. The only information given on this subject, and it is very sparing, is in the answers of the defendant Haggin, and we shall not say what weight they ought to have when attempted to be used against Prentiss; we shall now only touch upon their weight in his favor. There is a refusal to state explicitly how much was paid, to whom, and in what. It does not appear the price Prentiss bid for the land was ever paid the creditors secured by the deed of trust. White had the right, if Prentiss could derive an equity from the creditors by the payment to them of the purchase money, to require proof of the payment. But all this is attempted to be overthrown by insisting that White had no right to ask these questions, to make these enquiries, or put these matters in issue before he surrendered his estate. This position we are convinced can not be sustained, and on more mature reflection must, and we trust will be given up. To say that White should possess the legal title and possession, that he should be called on to surrender it, and yet be estopped to enquire to whom, and what are the merits of the claim which assails him, would be leading him to the contest fettered, and under the prospect of certain defeat, an instance of which can not be found in the registers of a correct chancery. We do not say, that White is entitled to settle up all the trustees' accounts, and look into the disposition of all the estate; but as far as the price of this estate is concerned, he has the right to ask for its disposition and approbation, and with this there is a refusal to gratify him. The complainant sets out a deed from Williamson to trustees to secure and pay debts, and calls upon White to surrender the legal estate, and the possession, and to pay up the mesne profits. He denies that the deed is for the payment of debts, but to defraud creditors. The complainant replies this is no concern of his. White insists if it is an honest deed the trustees have acted in such a manner as to destroy the merits of their equity, or of others claiming under them, as to him, and sets out this plea in bar in full. The complainant protesting against his right to use this matter in defense, replies that he comes clothed with the superior and meritorious equity of the cestui que trust, the creditors, whose equity is prior and superior to all, and such as could not be affected by the improper acts of the trustees, in which they did not participate. White rejoins traversing the fact of claim under the creditors, and declares in avoidance that the purchase was not for the benefit of creditors, and that they received none of the purchase money, and demands proof that they did. Here the complainant denies and insists that this matter is not well pleaded; that these are matters with which White has no business.--In short that they have a right to recover on facts, which White can not dispute, or avoid. To state this proposition is to refute it. We know of no such an estoppel in the rules of equity. *44 If, then, White has a right to enquire into this matter, we repeat there is no evidence of its truth, but on the contrary a disclosure of some facts which destroy the presumption of a purchase for creditors. The payment and appropriation does not appear. Prentiss is said to have represented the late Kentucky Insurance Company, or the debts due to it. This company was not a creditor secured by the deed nor was Prentiss a creditor, and in this we correct a statement to the contrary inadvertently made in the original opinion. Only some endorsers or sureties for Williamson to that bank, were indemnified against these responsibilities by the deed, and when Prentiss purchased to secure, as is alleged, the debts due to this institution, and he acknowledged that he bought for the bank, it was not in existence, but had expired by the terms of its charter. It is said that it was expected the legislature would bring it again to life, and the sale was a provision for this expectancy, which was shortly thereafter fulfilled, by the passage of a continuing or reviving act for a limited period. If this be so, there could not be much necessity for parting with the estate to secure a non-existing creditor, whose future existence was at least somewhat uncertain, and if it did revive, its debts could be discharged with its own paper admitted to be wofully depreciated; and these debts, if we can understand the disclosure of the answers, are all that were satisfied by the sale of this, as well as other estate of large value. Such a payment can not be a sufficient appropriation, even if proved, to clothe Prentiss or his heirs with the superior unaffected equity of the creditors, if such equity exists. That Prentiss represented the Kentucky Insurance Company, whose charter having expired, had no existence, to whom Williamson's sureties had been bound in obligations against which the conveyance was to indemnify them, and made the purchase for the company and caused the notes to be can-celled, was not a payment, and appropriation of the purchase money--For, The corporation was no creditor because it was not in existence. We have thus far considered the case exclusively, between Prentiss and White which was as far as it was considered in the original opinion, and we have arrived at the conclusion that that opinion, although not as fully or even as accurately expressed as it might have been, is substantially correct. If it is not, then the case of Springle and Bobb's heirs v. Morrison cited in that opinion and reported in  3 Litt. Rep. 52, is indubitably wrong and must be overturned. There Morrison was but an executor and trustee of the estate of George Nicholas, and held the real estate devised in trust, for the benefit of creditors and legatees, and as such he held a superior equity, and stood by and saw Jordan who had in fact no equity, sell this same estate to Smith, and Smith to the ancestors of the complainants. He stood silent or rather encouraged these sales, and never intimated his superior claim. The purchasers evidently took no equity from the vendors by these sales, and Morrison afterwards advanced, as executor, a considerable sum of money to remove a still superior lien standing out in the hands of the legal title holder, and clothed himself with this superior lien, and the legal estate. Yet for his deluding the ancestor of the complainants, and his vendor, by encouraging their purchases and not disclosing his title, he was decreed, trustee and executor as he was, without regard to the interest which he represented, to surrender this legal estate and subsequently acquired lien, without a restoration of the money advanced by him to acquire the legal estate. *45 If the survivor of two executors to whom the estate had been devised for payment of debts, stand by and see one purchase from the person to whom the other had sold by parol a parcel of the land on which the testator held a conveyance bond, and afterwards pays a balance of the purchase money and obtains the legal title, he must surrender it without being reimbursed. It is worthy of remark that his learned counsel in a petition for a rehearing relied on the point that Morrison was but a trustee and executor, and as such could not by his improper acts, lose the estate of those whom he represented; yet the petition was overruled and the opinion ordered to stand unaltered. If it was correct to make this trustee actually convey away an estate out of the trust fund, because he trifled with the rights of others so far as to be slightly instrumental in causing them to buy a bad title, and part with their money; certainly it can not be wrong to refuse to restore an estate to trustees, or their vendee, who has already been instrumental in placing the title where it is, by deluding the holder, although that holder may fall short of the merit of an innocent purchaser, for a valuable consideration, without notice. We have thus far considered this matter exclusively between White and Prentiss as a purchaser from the trustees of a bare equity which they claim, and we can not still get Prentiss or his heirs over that bar which the trustees have placed in his road, on principle or authority. We do not deem it necessary to pursue the enquiry further or determine whether this is to be considered as the cause of Haggin the trustee, or that of Prentiss, convinced as we are that Prentiss, having acknowledged that he bid for a non-existing creditor, and one who, by the deed had no direct interest when existing, and having shewn nothing, but a mere bid without payment, can not even claim the shoes of the creditors, if that would be an advantage, but only stand in the place of the trustees who ought not to be aided after their conduct with regard to this lottery. They, the trustees, acted more against law in fostering the lottery than White in purchasing his ticket and drawing his prize. The law placed all its penalties on the party to that lottery whose cause they espoused, and was designed as a protection to the purchasers, or to prevent deception and imposition upon them, according to the principles of Gray v. Roberts, 2 Marsh. 208. One who encouraged the maker of the lottery acted more against law than the purchaser of the ticket who drew the prize. It can not, therefore, be right to take this protection from such purchasers in a court of equity by relieving the side who aided the violation of law. The former opinion and decree must stand unaltered and affirmed. Ky.App. 1826. White's Heirs v. Prentiss' Heirs 3 T.B.Mon. 449, 19 Ky. 449, 1826 WL 1337 (Ky.) END OF DOCUMENT
